I begrudgingly pull up to the second window as instructed, all the while thinking about how I didn't pick that stupid penny up, and was even planning to tell the cashier about my "mishap" too...
♥ forever,
I didn't sleep that night. I laid awake thinking of Marge and that needle and the little prick of blood it had induced. I wondered if Marge had killed me and if the disease was in my body. I imagined pink and blue things swirling about in my blood, attaching to things and duplicating themselves. I thought of those terrifying adverts from the mid 80's that was my generations equivalent to the thought of nuclear warfare. At gone 3am I was up and in a real state. At that lowly hour I called my good friend Verity and sobbed down a phoneline what had happened. Verity, a one time nurse, couldn't do much right then but arranged to come and meet me in the morning. Until then not even huge amounts of smack could calm me – my mind couldn't be subdued on this one. Me, a severe hypochondriac at the best of times. Even when healthy I was convinced I was dying of cancer, and now I'd been given good reason to believe I was really dying. Well, that was too good an opportunity for my body to turn down. And so it panicked away... all night fucking long.
Everly Brothers Bye bye love US
When a regular fat like corn, soybean, or palm oil is blasted with hydrogen and turned into a solid, it becomes a trans-fat. These evil anti-nutrients help packaged foods stay “fresh,” meaning that the food can sit on the supermarket shelf for years without ever getting stale or rotting. Eating junk food with trans-fats raises your “bad” LDL cholesterol and triglycerides and lowers your “good” HDL. These fats also increase your risk of blood clots and heart attack. Avoid palm oil and other trans-fats like the plague, and kiss fried foods goodbye too, since they’re usually fried in one of these freakish trans-fatty oils.
On April 24th they received a letter informing them that council has a problem with their rain barrels.
Devo Corporate Anthem
As I've told you before, I am in love with these mosaic mirror candle sconces, and I found this one for only $15 at an antique shop in Ohio this fall. It adds a festive touch of sparkle to the simple rustic room, even without a candle (don't worry, I'm working on it).
They have only 2 g of fat (per large muffin) but 5 g of protein and 3 g of fiber! And not one drop of butter or oil! You could probably cut back on the sugar as well without much flavor difference. I might try that next time.
Mindless we lived and mindless we loved
I know there's some reader overlap here with my other blog, The Session Beer Project, but in case you don't usually keep an eye on it, I've got two new posts up there that might interest you.
Given that supposedly only 10 percent or less of the people left in town were white, and over forty percent of the dead were white, whites were dying at over four times their proportion. And that doesnt even take into consideration that whites were reportedly concentrated in “safer” places. Thus, I am convinced that blacks were on search-and-destroy missions, hunting down and murdering whites.”
So I started going up and down the floors, so that I could find something appropriate to wear. Although I almost bought a pair of sky high platforms, I then decided I couldn't walk in them (original, I know), so I ended up with a pair of black peep toes. Without any heel.
So, back to the southern seas collection. Imagine a world, before air travel, before the Panama Canal, when getting cargo or passengers from one ocean to another required a voyage through the southern seas. The route from Atlantic to Pacific involved a trip through the Straits of Magellan. A narrow channel between the mainland of South America and Tierra del Fuego. The straits were protected from the harsh conditions of the open ocean, but still subject to bad whether, powerful and unpredictable currents, and shallow reefs.
Her drying combinations touched by the sun’s last rays,
Three times in this book of Acts we have the singular account of Saul’s conversion. The first, in Acts 9 is the historical evidence. The second, here in chapter 22, is the account before the multitude of the Jews. The third is seen in chapter 26 and is his defense before the political King Agrippa. Each relates itself to the circumstances of the time.
Overall, I'd highly recommend these glitters!
Seeing the desperate straights, Anselme hatched a clever plan and withdrew from the northern front to begin a summoning ritual. All the while, Brother Vang raced to and fro among the trenches of the hilltop, working to support his fellows and provide healing as he could. Aurakraul appeared from among the foggy skies to loose a cone of scalding acid from behind the giant mummy to the south, sizzling against the back of the behemoth and liquefying many of the skeletons about Zantric while the man himself received injury from the effort.
I remember holding him.
And I had snuggled my little brother
Right, well, thats all for now folks – I am going to retire to the clean and tidy sitting room with a beer, the TV, the laptop, the husband and probably the cat. Hope you are all having a fab weekend.
Rotten Tomatoes: 85%
They proceeded with favorable weather until 25 May, when land was seen and they cast anchor in a bay to which they gave the name of Espiritu Santo (now Tampa Bay). The army landed on Friday, 30 May, 1539. That was the start of an adventure that took de Soto and his band nearly halfway across the continent in search of gold, silver, and jewels.
From the inbox late on Monday night…
Frutti di Mare Brochettes
(30) QUESTION: Dear Kryon, I don’t understand something: If we were our complete spirit beings when we purposely wrote our contracts for Human life, then as Humans, why should we be trying to cancel those contracts to create a new path? Shouldn’t we honor what we as all-knowing spirits agreed to and wanted to participate in?
I'll use it in some cookies... for which I found a perfectly great sounding recipe on the back of the rolled oat bag. Looks like the perfect granola bar shall remain elusive....for now.
As we are knitting, laughing, and generally having a marvelous time, people walk by to say “hi” and some to stop and chat. Women want to know about knitting, so we are able to open the world of knitting up to someone new. We both know how to crochet, but prefer knitting.
Now, is there room in my sewing room for a screen and a few tubs of dye?!!
The line-up includes speakers Sheila Walsh, Luci Swindoll, Lisa Harper, Angie Smith; musical guests Mary Mary and Natalie Grant; and other talents Nicole Johnson and Henry Cloud. What a group!
Lovers! are very kind
And then somehow, despite all that, they hand you a moment. It's as if they hand you a little gift and say, "Here. This is what we look to people who are not you. In case you forgot."
It has been 6 weeks since my ex-husband, HSSH, has called. It has been Labor Day since he has seen any of the kids.
I would feel so lucky,
It's so hard to believe that this was 3 1/2 years ago and now 2 more children have been dedicated since Grant was the "baby of the family". It is nice to look back and remember what life was like with 3 little ones :)
Strawberry Layer:
Strength: The Wildcats can throw out one of the best frontcourts in the nation. Jake Cohen and De’Mon Brooks dominated play in the Southern Conference this season. Throw in wing player Chris Czerapowicz and they are matchup nightmare. All three rebound the ball well, but are shooting 36.2 percent from three as a trio. That makes them hard to guard and a headache to prepare for.
She is there, small, powerful, spinner of threads, weaver of webs, symbol of fate, totem of life, death, renewal.
AWAKE - After a car "accident", an LA detective wakes up in different realities, one where his wife is still alive, one where his son is still alive. He gets clues from each reality to help solve his cases. He is beginning to realize it might not have been an "accident". Which reality is real? It's a little sappy sometimes but the concept appeals and back story is captivating.
The other day he showed me his summersaults in the water. He decided to try a back summersault. At first, it just wouldn't work. A minute later, he had it. Two minutes later, he was doing three in a row. And his handstands in the water are pretty good. He can only swim about 10 feet so far, but I won't be surprised if he's swimming the length of the pool in a few weeks. (Or maybe it will take a few years, like all the other big advances... I never can predict.)
So I should just be glad I survived my run. I started out pretty strong for a hot, gross night but faded over time. That's okay, though. I was running with a guy who was pushing his daughter in the jogging stroller for the first time so I was slowing down for him. Yeah, that's it.
10 I go to Marmaris on 19th October - woohoo!
We share the same one
Life is sweet, don’t think it isn’t. There may be trials in your world today, but they are temporary. Time—along with trials—will pass. Don’t waste time fretting about what could have been. We should always hook our wagons to the “what-is”, remembering who it is that’s holding all of our tomorrows; because honestly … it isn’t us.
Asked an emotional Moon.
2. Decide on a design. This required first deciding on what type of flowers we were using as I really wanted it all to gel. This also required endless nights spent in front of my computer on invitation sites, searching for the perfect one. Which I didn’t find. Which is exactly when my wonderfully talented sister came on the scene to create this, invitation & RSVP post card.
For all the ingredients:
I did a good deed yesterday, though.
I just saw, while I worked out this morning, on the Today Show, an interview with Tyra Banks about an upcoming show Ms Banks is doing. She will have young, teenaged girls who have, and I quote, ‘had multiple sex partners.’ One, 15, has had nine different sexual partners. I’m just thinking, and of course I admit that it is none of my business what you preach at your church, you might want to tackle a subject a little deeper than getting the married couples in your church to ‘do it’ God’s way or otherwise. Maybe what we need is a little abstinence and fasting? I don’t know, maybe, holiness, righteousness, sacrificial living, purity, marriage as an image of the relationship between Christ and His Church–you know, something that might actually benefit the hearer. Something that might actually exalt Christ instead of the flesh. Sex doesn’t make the Gospel attractive. Jesus does.
I can feel the stretch of the trees that shelter all
"I love you," I say, just in case, and hang up the phone.
1. Trouble in the Shotgun 2:50
Something has always felt slightly off in Meghan's life, ever since her father disappeared before her eyes when she was six. She has never quite fit in at school or at home.
This was the principal used so cleverly by the marketers of Stella Artois in their "reassuringly expensive" slogan. Psychologists and economists have repeatedly demonstrated that people prefer wine they are told is expensive to wine they are told is cheap, even if it is identical – or inferior. People want to be seen as demonstrating taste and discernment, and higher price is the biggest clue available that an item is superior.
This project was made with retired Stampin Up designer series papers, ribbon and eyelets.
“Haiku II” – An Attempt At Poetic Form I Know Very Little of
When Mr Bull challenged him, Mr Taylor walked away, muttering “Just go on the sick again”.
"Oh Yeah" said the son.
For a moment I had forgotten the pain
You have to go try it for yourself. I'm totally hooked. So far, it is burning completely EVENLY, too. It is so hard to find a candle that actually does that. I'm amazed! So, what are your favorites?
Why a writing notebook? you may ask. Why not just tip, tap, type away on my laptop? My answer is simple. You need it. Writing with a pen or pencil is completely different from typing on a computer. It uses different parts of your body, different parts of your brain. I taught college for a long time, and I was always fascinated by a roomful of students taking an essay test. As their pencils moved, their whole bodies became involved in the writing process. Some bobbed their heads, some hunched over, some moved their mouths as if speaking the words, some slid right to the edge of their chairs, almost as if they were about to hop up and chase after the elusive perfect phrase. We don't use our whole bodies in the same way when we type, and we certainly don't use our brains in the same way. Writing by hand is messy business. When our hand moves across the page there's a direct physical connection between thought and hand and pen and page. We are touching our thoughts, tracing them, shaping them into being, almost like a sculptor. I'm talking magic, and that's just what we need to do some serious writing. So if you feel like working on your writing this winter, get yourself a writing notebook--or start a new one special just for 2011. If you feel artsy, decorate it. If you can't be bothered with that, leave it plain. But DO put your name and email address on it, and do write somewhere on the inside cover a dollar amount award for its recovery if lost. Make it have value right from the start. Make it your very own.
Instead of simply ‘privacy’, this particular concept appends the ‘2.0’ to reflect the new era of digital and internet privacy that are still being addressed using concepts, practices and legal precedents that can be said to apply to an ‘earlier’ conception of privacy – ‘privacy 1.0’.
In honor of Blogging Against Disablism Day, I urge you to check out Gin and Lemonade, a wonderfully witty blog by a wonderfully witty woman who, among other things, writes prolifically about living with a disability. She rocks—and (quite literally) rolls.
Did anyone else open their windows a crack today, and need their sunglasses for the first time in weeks ? Of course it's too early to call it spring, but we like these little reminders that bluer skies are on their way. And today's sunshine seemed like a perfect match for this delicious and wholesome farro salad. We made this one very organically--a little of this and a little of that--and it came out divine. So we won't give you strict measurements here--use more of what you love and less of what you don't and you won't be disappointed.
I DID, however, get to join in on a true, real, honest to God traditional Norwegian Julebord, and it was an awful lot of fun.
- Put frozen grapes, apple, or any other food (including formula or breastmilk) into a mesh feeders for instant relief.*
Everything on this card is from my leftover stash...
LILLIPUT MODEL 2009 DOUBLE DIN 7 INCHES EBY701-NP/C/T VGA TOUCH SCREEN MONITOR
You can subscribe to the series in iTunes. The first episode is now available and they are talking about ‘when did you start working from home and what was the prompt that made you jump?’. I’ve downloaded it to listen to on my next car journey!
And I wonder if they really care, or give a damn
Thank you to everyone that entered into our last challenge, wow you are a talented bunch!! Please scroll down to find out who our Top 3 are
This can be seen where Marx reiterates why and how money is logically necessary which he says several places such as:
The shit hit the fan. Big time. My boss started to yell at me at the top of his lungs that how could I do such thing, how could I not believe in our client and buy a mobile phone from somewhere else... I barely remember what happened next, because when I get really angry I do the hulk thing and forget what I say, all I can remember is saying, at sort of the top of MY lungs (I didn't have any problems screaming back): well, OUR client does not make any affordable plans for a person like ME who earns ALMOST NOTHING!
~C.S. Lewis, Mere Christianity, p.169
Moral principles, sustainment of society and using government to enforce the secular requirements of those can build a Nation stronger via the promulgation of those morals from people willing to go all-out in all venues to win the day. The Left has won in many areas because no Conservatives have shown up with the right tools nor prepared the battleground. That can change the moment you change from seeing this as just a principled moral issue and one that goes far and wide beyond just morals and engages everything we do as a people. That means fewer tactics, placards, yelling, screaming, and more engaged debate and backing your moral principles with your time, effort, money and love. Together they will forge something that will not be broken. Right now they are scattered and a number of things left undone that could be done... that does not rest upon me, but upon you.
My quilt was started last summer, pairing my 30's stash with my Go!Baby fabric cutter. It's 48" by 64" quilted in Hurricane all over pattern on Quilters Dream select.
Of my heartbeat, my arterial traffic,
white-washed. I LOVE how it turned out! And the best part is, it cost less than $10.
- 2 teaspoons active dry yeast
Yesterday was my first full day in Vegas. While waking up at 6am to answer East Coast emails after only 5 and a half hours of sleep was pretty miserable, I have to say that I am actually enjoying being here. I think what I am enjoying most about it (besides the whole not sitting in my cubicle for 9+ hrs a day) is that for the most part, everyone here is in such a great mood. Everywhere you look there is a smiling face, a group of friends laughing, or someone slapping high fives after a win at the black jack table. Even though I spent 14+ hours working today, I ended the day feeling energized and happy because of all the excitement around me.
My hero - Sheriff Joe Arpaio (he of the pink underwear and tent jail in Arizona) - has a bounty on his head. Why? Because he dares to enforce the law. America better deal with Mexico quick-fast if its going to survive in the future. The border is leaking Mexican criminals into the country and if Obama doesn't have the cohones to do his job properly then Joe the Sheriff (not the plumber) will have to do it for him.
1/4 yellow or white onion
Layout, Atmosphere, Floorcraft: A small, curious underground room with a bar at one side. Two-thirds of the floor is wooden and the other third tiled. They are partly divided by a huge, awkward square pillar to the left of centre, which makes it very tricky to form a sensible line of dance. The bar is not seperate, so you can trip over people socialising and trying to get served. It's also very easy for a couple, or even one person, to block the passage around the pillar. It wasn't crowded, though, so it was manageable and floorcraft was not a major problem. There is a long room off to the side where you can hide your bag, and hang your coat up, and even change your shoes if you prefer not to do that at the side of the dance floor. Plenty of comfortable chairs, pleasant and friendly atmosphere, although too many people concentrating at the bar can start to intrude on the dancing.
In August of 2008, all three of them came to visit and through a series of events we decided to go to Machu Picchu in Peru. They had a night in Quito and a day in Loja before we left. We then took a 7 hour bus ride to the Peruvian border, spent like 5 hours waiting for our flight and then another night and a day before we arrived in Cusco. A day later, we had planned to take the train to Machu Picchu and had worked out a taxi to come pick us up. The morning of our great adventure, the taxi didn't show up when it said it would... so we waited... and waited. By the time it got there, we were going to miss the train. If you don't know, there is only ONE train to get there and if you miss it, you're just outta luck. We were praying all the way there that we would make it/yelling at the taxi driver to hurry.
And oh! If we ever part,
"second largest st. patrick's day party goes dark" yep, river street festivities went down, bars were closed and the cops had to try and move thousands of people off what used to be the wharf of this port town up cobblestone ramps to the street and away from the river - all in the dark. generators did power some extra lights eventually, but it was a step back into the past here for a while. the only lights around here were from gas lamps that are now just novelty lighting and not on every street. no wonder this and every other town shut down early...it was DARK outside! i can see why robert louis stevenson used savannah as the setting for the opening chapters of treasure island. the river so close, the spanish moss in the trees and the flickering gas light....a true pirate town. i'm normally not an easily frightened person, but, i swear, if i could have managed to carry a baseball bat AND walk the dog, baby, i would have!
Once again I will be on vacation during the month of May. This means that I will be away for my youngest daughter’s birthday. This is not the first time I missed my daughter Susan’s birthday. In fact I have missed it a few times before. It does make me feel bad but it is the best time to go on vacation. If I start my vacation in the spring before the schools close the sites are much less crowded.
“In every war people are crippled, killed and disappeared, their whereabouts unknown, that is a fact,” Videla said in an interview broadcast on local television.
There was a time in the afternoon where it looked like all of it wouldn't fit, but my men have a knack for packing and eventually got it all in there! They picked the trailer up this evening and we will meet it next week in Missouri! It was kind of surreal watching our things drive away. It was good too though, to realize it's just stuff, it can all be replaced, what's important is the people in our lives.
Another chicken story…
Orhan Ogreblade reports that Grimtotem activity in Feralas has shifted. They’re still making frequent attacks on the Gordunni ogres, but apparently they’re becoming more focused. The ogre outpost in the hills north of Camp Mojache has pretty much been wiped out (now maybe the goblins can go dig up their own damn ore what with the coast being clear), but they’ve pretty much stopped attacking the southern camps. From what we can tell, nearly all their efforts now are being focused on the ogres around Dire Maul.
For the most part, though, Allen's suggestions make tons of sense, coming as they do from someone with an extraordinary depth of experience with TDCJ and the political institutions that govern it. It's great to see knowledgeable folks speaking out to say that cutting probation and treatment shouldn't be TDCJ's only response to the budget crisis.
Deep fry tau kan until crispy and put aside to drain away any excess oil. Heat up frying pan and add in around 3 table spoons of vegetable oil. Sautéed onions and chilly paste until you can smell nice aroma coming out from these ingredients. Add in lime juice, salt and sugar to taste. Add in peanuts and taukan. Sever with nasi lemak (coconut milk rice)
She isn’t the typical shrinking violet character and though she is compassionate, brave and kind, Makino has major flaws: regardless of how funny it is, punching people out is hardly the way to solve things. Her quick temper and stubbornness hurt people, just like her belief that the wealthy all behave like the insipid morons at her school. When things don’t go smoothly for the her and Domyouji (and let’s face it, they never do), she frets and wavers which hurts everyone involved.
"You taught me how to write a completely new kind of email... and I just sent this to my list."
“Umm…I think I meant rig-coat-uh, but sure.”
The Goddess of Luck (spelled Lakṣmī, but pronounced almost exactly like “luck-shh.me”) is fickle. Luck never stays with any one person forever. But she herself always and forever stays at the feet of the All-Attractive. That is a testament to the ever newer and newer beauty, fascination and charm of Śrī Kṛṣṇa.
Here in "town" - sorry, to me it really isn't a town - there will be the big carnival party today with a carnival parade, a party at the market place and a party afterwards - all this with the best band around: keine Ahnung (which means something like "no idea"). So, I won't see my hubby until sometimes monday... ;)
Desserts are my favourite course of the meal. A warning though. If you’re going to eat at Hard Rock Cafe, you’ll have to ensure you have space for the dessert. We were stuffed but our love for tres leches and cheesecake respectively gave us courage to order. I am a cheesecake convert, that is to say I didn’t start out loving them but now I can’t do without them on the menu. This particular one was massive. It took 3 people to finish. As Salonee rightly pointed out, it was ‘dense’ too. Though the good thing was it just melted in my mouth and I really appreciated that.
And both Terrys.
Until we establish our plan to align with God’s will nothing we do shall prosper.
Just look at these figures and draw your own conclusions:
I told her to call her husband and let him know his boy was safe.
“The Thai government will have a very difficult time explaining why the trial of someone charged with making an insulting remark could compromise Thailand’s national security,” he said.
JACK laughed. "I don't know where your misery comes into it, but Jesus returned invisibly in 1914. He's in the process of driving out the devil's minions. The devil is the author of the Trinity doctrine."
Alan Simpson said
Anyways, the point of this post is that I LOVE actual invites. I do not judge if you invite me somewhere via facebook or evite, but I personally love the look and feel of an actual paper invite. For me, especially, they are super easy to whip up, and since I'm a lover of all things old fashioned, I appreciate the nod to the past in which things were amiably formal.
And the coldness all but blinds me.
Forster’s Tern 2
“About Jesus of Nazareth,” they replied. “He was a prophet, powerful in word and deed before God and all the people. The chief priests and our rulers handed him over to be sentenced to death, and they crucified him; but we had hoped that he was the one who was going to redeem Israel. And what is more, it is the third day since all this took place. In addition, some of our women amazed us. They went to the tomb early this morning but didn’t find his body. They came and told us that they had seen a vision of angels, who said he was alive. Then some of our companions went to the tomb and found it just as the women had said, but him they did not see.”
Similar to the beach, getting married is very popular. The flowers and the like contribute to a very elegant and relaxed setting. Every year, thousands of people get married in a park especially parks which are in a very scenic setting. Again you need to go through the exercise of taking everything to the park. The photos here will also be very elegant.
The trio Ikea Satan plays satanic blues-metal. Unnur Kolka drums, Pétur Úlfur plays guitar and sings, and Hannes Þór plays bass. The Wait is taken from their three-song Sound Of The Planet EP, released last year on Icelandic label Ching Ching Bling Bling.
And that brings us to Z which is for Zzzzzzz – what I intend to do all month next month. Starting now!
Blaming and complaining work really well together…too well.
Tengo’s narrative follows his involvement in a sketchy ghostwriting operation with a teenage girl who has escaped from a religious cult, the one from whom Aomame later hides herself. The resulting novella, an immediate literary success, brings unwanted attention from this religious cult which is seeking both the teenage author and Aomame via harassment of Tengo. I had issues with Tengo’s character development especially in his growing obsession with Aomame, perhaps similar to my frustration with her, because at first there is relatively little mention of her. He is his own person, with his own storyline. And then seemingly suddenly he begins this whole obsession with her, having been supposedly in love with her all this time.
Type of book: Thriller
MasterMind is a book of many parts …. I am to this day amazed at its diversity of purpose …..I read it as a book on success where I could attract wealth to me through the grand purpose of sharing my book with others for their success.
These photo-art images above were created from shots I took on one of my walks through the local countryside. Little water-colour patchworks, snipped and smudged and coloured and painted till they formed the images that my memory was keeping..
Consequences When I was a newbie to RAD, I was pretty clueless about how to handle giving consequences to my son. What had always worked for me with my other kids absolutely did not work with him. Although I sort of knew the 'why' behind it it didn't make it any easier to navigate my way through the stormy seas I was sailing through.
p.s. en een pootje van Amar! (net naar de trimster geweest..., wat een knapperd, he?!)
That title up there is actually quite deceptive. From the sound of it, you would think I have exciting plans for the weekend. Actually, I don't.
If the scenes where Diana wanders around Venice were like flipping through a copy of Italian Vogue circa 1991, then the rave scene's equivalent would have to be the act of perusing a back issue of The Face (the one with Adamski on the cover with his dog immediately springs to mind). Flaccid cocks flapping without a care in the world, twirling pasties, baseball hats with the word "boy" written on them in metallic capital letters, white cut-off overalls, casual transvestism, glow in the dark fanny packs, smart drinks, cellular telephones, and belts made out of compact discs, the sheer amount of fashion blunders present throughout this techno-heavy scene are enough to make your head spin. Nevertheless, Diana manages to transverse this gaudy spectacle with an air of stylish unflappability.
You must be 18 and over to enter.
Sweet and mushily grilled peach segments are the perfect offsetting taste to the salty cured meat, although the salt flake flecked rocket didn’t really help the cause.
Crackdown: Nick Clegg last night called for a ‘tycoon tax’ to address the problem of tax evasion by the nation’s highest earners
The young hatchling of a dragon dug into the cow as I laid down at the cave opening. Mother and father were gone to the nesting grounds, leaving Krono and I here to fend for ourselves. “You’ll be alright. Your father and I have trained you for this day very well,” she said. The memory angered me every time. Why would she leave us? We had been doing fine for 3 months now, but things were lonely when you were the only thing with wings out here, besides the birds. And even they stood clear of us, for they were snacks if they got too close.
I used this one.......
Palmer also claims that he will use state-of-the-art 21st Century technology and the latest navigation and safety systems in the new ship.
For this week's card I used Millie Umbrella. I chose her for my card this week for two reasons. One, she's adorable and such a cute stamp for Spring cards! Second, because she's awesome for newbies like me to learn shadows and shading with Copics! Because you instantly know all the shadows will be under the umbrella it makes it a lot easier to know where to lay down your darker colors. This was only my second go at shading skin tones, so please excuse the imperfections. Though I think even the Copic pros are always learning and evolving with Copics and their techniques. But if you're new to shading I couldn't think of a better image to try!
boofle and first edition boho chic papers
Now … that’s not to say that man does not attempt to box God in. In fact, that is frequently one of our favorite pastimes … limiting God.
Just popping in once again to say hello. We are still unplugged, and still loving it. In fact, I completely dropped Facebook - even the small, intimate account I had set up for family & local friends. I never thought I'd be able to do that, but I did - yay me!
But I think the heart of the problem is that so many people feel trapped in a job or a field they’re unequipped for, either by skill or temperament. At some point they got slotted in to a certain occupation or industry and they never managed to make their way out of that track.
Although I have had this video for over twenty years I keep discovering new details. I refer to the reactions by the participants of the troupe, and not to the curtain, - which has of course seen some great acts over the years (you may remember this video, and I´m sure you´ll find more examples on Ngoni´s great Youtube channel).
Last night Sir Andrew Green, of Mig­rationWatchUK said: “Eng­land, with Holland, is al­ready the most crowded country in Europe.
The committee is on an oversight visit to the North West this week and will be visiting Itsoseng police station on Tuesday, Stella on Wednesday, Potchefstroom on Thursday, and Bedwang on Friday.
I had a little War Horse talk with her yesterday, telling her that if there was any way to do it, I'd find her again and make sure she never knew the feeling of a rough hand again.
Since before Christmas, the 10 year old’s school has been preparing the children in his year group for these tests. Practice paper after practice paper. Result after result. This one a little higher the next a little lower till the children are living, breathing and sleeping SATs. For about the past month the 10 year old hasn’t greeted me after school with the days gossip about friends or how he made a try in rugby. I’ve been met with ‘Mum I got a 4c in Maths’ or ‘I did better this time I got a 4a.’ When I tell him that I couldn’t care less about the tests his face becomes crestfallen. The conflict between the expectations of home and school confusing him. I end up balancing every comment with ‘if it’s important to you then that’s great.’
My tradition/beliefs do not “rate” other paths as either superior or inferior; at least for the most part. There are many ways to perceive and understand truth without requiring everyone to follow the same path. For instance, consider the color green. There are many shades and varieties, but they are all “green”. Now, I’ll pretty much guarantee that the type of green you were envisioning was different than mine (I had in mind a blended lime and forest green that’s surrounding a picture not far from me right now), but it is no less green than mine. Now, if you were to try and tell me that candy apple red, fuscha, or hot pink were the same as “green”, then we’d have a problem.
Fifty years is long enough. It is high time to compensate the victims for this shameful chapter in our history. H.R. 2634 will go a long way toward doing just that.
He froze.
The New York Times posted a cool story this morning about a very rare map in the Brooklyn Historical Society (BHS) collection that was only just rediscovered and restored (a before and after photo is above). The 1770 map by Bernard Ratzer is titled "Plan of the City of New York." The only other institutions to have copies are the British Library and the New-York Historical Society.
1 cup honey
The Doctor: So, what you're saying is that before Plato existed, someone had to have the idea of Plato.
Call of a callee comprises of all the dialogs it is involved in. I think a Call is same as a Session.
I've thought about this a lot at various times, and the answer tends to change based on recent experiences.
rain boots: 2"
But, as usual, I digress. Back to Dogs...
Iron Safe/Leaf of World Tree Quest
I've just come across Menswear line Percival and if like me, you're impartial to a nice boyish rainmac then this should be right up your street. The collection is pleasingly small and their website overall very polished and '2010 hipster design' but also easy to navigate. Though the video that accompanies the collection is all a bit too Topman for my liking (lads -note not 'men'- with carefully coiffed bouncing hair running through a forest and giving each other nosebleeds and all rather Private School) I can't fault that Yellow Wax Mac. Infact I'll go one better, I want that Yellow Wax Mac with it's thin grey pinstriped lining and it's 'scottish beeswax cotton'. If dazzling descriptions like 'scottish beeswax cotton' whets your appetite then you haven't seen anything yet. May I interest you in some fine Portuguese cotton melange? How about a little 'heavyweight melton from Yorkshire'?
Since you all gave such nice feedback on my
to show you real barrenness:
19. Pat And Atom Are Friends
Saturday we had to pick up SIL's gift for the miscellaneous shower on Sunday and head to hometown. I had to run to the bridal shop in hometown to try on my bridesmaids' dress and pay the balance on it. Then it was off to my Mom's to drop off the Munchkins, then to drop hubby off to go hunting, and then off to set up for the lingerie shower.
I'm not sure if that's normal. It might just be because I have so little modesty. It's not like I ever shut the door before having kids, so it's not a forgetful-parent thing. It's just easier to leave it open. I feel less disconnected from my family members. And I just don't care if my husband or kids sees or hears me go to the bathroom. Although there are certain times when I do need privacy and shut the door.
Row 33: Cast off 2 stitches, knit to the end of the row. (8 stitches)
Santiago taught me to dream and aspire for the fulfillment of my dreams. I am sure that there are many others like me who were inspired by this boy. Best of all, he taught me the power of dreams, what miracles we can perform once we start believing in them. And the most important diktat in my life till today– Love truly has no language.
Losing streaks can be produced by the faulty use of a tactic, inefficient analysis of market direction and internals, or others. Knowing that no system or pattern can assure the trader that they will not lose in THIS instance should prepare the trader to accept that losses are a reality. Since the technical patterns many use provide probability edges to the trader, in the natural course of a large number of trades there will be periods where you may experience more losses than usual.
Why “transmedia”?
If you want to read some random and funny things about me, my scrap habits, and my favorite TV shows, you can find the dirt here.
One of them I can only surmise (with surprise) that he is looking for a bottom (as described in the 12 Steps). The funny thing is I could help him. But I am hesitant to explain this to him. He just wouldn’t get it. He’s not suffering from self-obsession. He’s suffering from self-delusion? But he is a good guy down deep.
Sure enough! There are brookies. I need to go back and fish more of it when Toni and the pups aren’t with me. I didn’t have much time fishing, but enough to fish a couple minutes before the black flies became too much for the Tonester. The best spots always seemed well draped with branches and stuff and boy that new JP Ross 5′ 2 wt. sure would have been handy today!
Too hot? They stop running when it’s snowed, they stop running when it’s too hot. Did it not occur to anyone to make these transportations devices which are rather important to the British transport infrastructure a little more all-weather compatible?
05 - My Cancer
By His Will
Which raises the question … am I writer because I was so often an outsider, or was I an outsider, because I was always a writer?
My oldest daughter said she hoped it wasn't cheesy. Some of those types of movies are. Of course, it DID have Matt Damon in it, so even if it was boring, it would still be worth watching, in my opinion! Those mesmerizing blue eyes...
Meanwhile, stir together the cooked rice, cumin, allspice, cayenne, garlic, chipotle chile, sour cream and 1/2 cup of the Gruyere cheese. Taste and adjust seasonings, then add salt to taste. Add rice mixture to the skillet and stir until onions are mixed well with the rice. (Alternatively, you can bake the casserole in a greased 10-inch baking pan.) Top with the rest of the Gruyere cheese and bake for 30 minutes uncovered or until brown and bubbling. Serve topped with cilantro, if you like.
It's true, the fresh bottle let down my expectations. It was never really going to live up to my first taste experiences, and how much I bigged it up in my head. Having said that though, trying the aged version DESTROYED my expectations, and wrote them completely anew!
I've read so many good reviews about this product, so me and my mom wanted to give it a try!
Someone gave me their definition of the Trilogy that I now have on my easel – God, the father, Artist; God the Holy Spirit, Inspiration; God the Son, Expression. By no means do I take that to mean that as an artist, I’m God. But there is no question, God is an artist – just look around at nature, it’s awesome!
INDEPENDENT NEWSPAPERS
Nejame referred them to Mark O'Mara, Zimmerman's present attorney. NeJame has also since been hired by CNN to provide commentary on the trial. O'Mara was the one who requested that Judge Recksiedler recuse herself.
72. You’re cute! Mind if I use you so I can impress my friends?
Cardstock: Stampin' Up!-Barely Banana (retired)
A prolific songwriter in the last couple of years Phil has also written tracks for Shannon Noll, Adam Harvey, Anthony Callea, Deni Hines, David Hobson, Belinda Emmett and Dean Geyer as well as contributing significantly to the Australian vocal Production Music label (extract from unippm.com.au)
That's when my heart stopped.
Title and Cover Discussion: One of the things I didn’t get to talk about in the review was the purple hibiscus motif, which was subtly woven into the story to lead us to some of the novel’s most memorable scenes. Anyhow, the title is brilliant and if you’re curious about how Adichie uses the purple hibiscus as a symbol, I say read it to find out. 8D As for the cover... I don’t know, I’m really sick of cut-off female faces, and on top of that, the black-and-white photograph doesn’t do it any favours. Another cover has the hibiscus in actual purple, but I don’t really want to rate a cover if I haven’t seen it with my own two eyes. (I find that seeing covers online and in real life is two very different experiences.) Soooooo I’m going to cheat on the cover ratings and drop them. I just don’t feel fair with faulting a cover when there’s another one out there that may be better. It just brings too much attention to the old cover, ya know? Feel free to share your thoughts on the cover, or anything you want.
and unruffled purr
a shriek.
My happiness never ends
Most of the cards linked on Katharina's post are blue/red (boy!) spider Henry's! I decided to make mine a "Spider Henrietta!" - we need female heroes too right?
I have a confession.
Tacks
We all know what an abysmal track record Hollywood has when it comes to making movies from great books. With that being considered, I guess I should consider myself lucky that I didn’t read the books that preceded my favorite movies and that most of my favorite books have never made it to the silver screen.
Only a minority blew up our transport? –
She got her taste for horror early, watching Alien at age four with the rest of her family (her older siblings chickened out, but Julianne hung in till the end).
You may have noticed that I have a frog sitting on the lid of my ORT's jar. The other day I was in the Red Dot store (type of $2 shop) and I spotted a key ring with a frog on it for $2! So I bought it.... once I had removed the hook from his head I attached him to the ORT's lid with velcro and now I have a guardian of the "frogs" in the ORT's jar.
Well, what have they got? T. S. Eliot cherished the permanent things and St. Margaret’s church gives that sense. The town grew around it and the market founded in 1101 by Bishop Herbert de Losinga of Thetford. There are several impressive late medieval merchants’ houses in the town. This architecture is an inheritance of trade and it is still an active port. As I walked around the quayside I saw history alive and not a fossilised compartment separate from life because traditional buildings are in use.
As a teenager, presenting male, I “threw like a girl” (not a good thing) and twice I threw something without thinking or caring and was surprised to hit the target (in one case, the back of someone’s head). And I read that in playing tennis, after perfecting each stroke and response, the best players show very little brain activity in performing those shots: not all the judging and thinking, just the perfect part of the brain for the shot.
Look at the word “often” as used in 1Corinthians 11:26 like this: You have a prescription filled and it says to take this medicine with water or food as often as you take it or when you take it. You then have to go to the directions to see how often the doctor wants you to take the pills. I believe the same applies to this verse, go to the directions given by the Holy Spirit on how often to “eat this bread and drink this cup.”
As the mission rehearsal and details are being worked out, back in Washington, politics are at play in the decision to mount the offensive and when it should occur. This is recent history made to come alive in a most readable and compelling manner.
While driving down Bellevue Way this afternoon, I can see from NE 4th a fire engine coming toward Main from SE 10th… IT WAS THAT OBVIOUS… from 14 blocks away! I could see all of the drivers pulling over to the RIGHT to give the fire truck the right of way, as it should be, all except for the STUPID BEEEAAATCH in the white BMW who felt the necessity to beat the fire truck to the light on Main so that she could take a left… she sped up trying to stay ahead of the fire truck and they kept gaining on her, sirens blaring, horn blowing, and lights flashing. REALLY?!!!! What driving school did she attend, because she apparently missed the part about emergency vehicles having the right of way. Where are the police when you need them?
Today, our citizens are not given the chance to make decisions in the legislative, the executive and the judiciary. The voices of elected opposition representatives are often muted and ignored too.
I couldn’t help but smile when I recognized the scene I got to watch. Charlie and I were heading to a concert, and he showed up in a new orange Dodge Charger. His intelligence never super ceded his sense of humor, and Dukes of Hazzard, as far as he was concerned, was the epitome of television.
*You guys? There is a nursery tucked behind the master bedroom. You know what that means right? CLOSET ROOM. I AM SO EXCITED! I can't wait to get it all set up and share!
A veiled attempt to shine a fair amount of murky light on the ills of imperialism, yet, at the same time, create a fluffy piece of family-friendly entertainment, Golden Temple Amazons is here to enlighten and amuse in equal measure. Hey, wait a minute. Aren't there a lot of naked women parading around with their breasts exposed in this movie? I mean, that doesn't exactly sound "family-friendly," if you ask me? Well, if it wasn't for breasts, there would be no families. Think about that the next time you're about to get into a tizzy after you find out that your eight year-old son accidentally catches a glimpse an unclothed tittie. Speaking of eight year-olds, I would totally let little kids watch this movie, lax nipple coverage be damned. Be damned, I say.
Being tired... really tired is worth having that little boy in our arms... watching him smile, hearing him giggle and watching him learn... we love every minute of it!
4 scallions, chopped, use white and green parts
Two of the three remaining pistols were virtually identical. They were much heavier than the one that Xu Guan had selected and only carried a handful of .45 caliber rounds in each magazine. Xu Guan paused for a moment, thinking that he would have spare parts if he selected one of these pistols, and then tossed them in the creek as he decided the lighter weight and higher round capacity was worth not having spare parts.
I've been checking for weeks to see if I could get it to download ahead of time--no go.
Freshly folded vintage linens. A jar of embroidery thread. A hot waffle dinner with family and a bowl full of prettily colored jordan almonds (even the box was pretty).
Combine the BBQ sauce, Worcestershire and honey in a large skillet. Heat to a boil. Stir in meatballs. Simmer, covered, about 10 min, until meatballs are heated through. Stir often. Serve meatballs warm with party picks and enjoy your game!
12 cups popcorn (I used air-popped popcorn. Beth uses "natural" flavor microwave popcorn.)
When I hopped on over myself to see what it was all about, I was thrilled to discover that I was the proud recipient of the Liebster Blog Award, which is for blog newbies who have less than 100 followers. You often see peeps with blog awards in their sidebar, and now I'm one of them. *happy dance*
And I call up MacGregor from the grave,
Mitt Romney hates Hilary Rosen, Rachel Madow, Arianna Huffington, and other many other liberal women, and hating is a form of caring.
Your mom was right: violence is not the answer. If your mom was really smart, she also taught you that government is little more than a monopoly on violence. In some cases, such as countering aggressive force, violence is entirely appropriate. In most cases it is absolutely not.
“Should wait”
"My sisters gone to London Moon. My masters ex-boyfriend took her away to London town!"
This blog has been a wonderful tool for that. All of those nasty, hurtful and awful thoughts flow through my fingers onto this page and out into cyber space. The happy, loving and grateful thoughts have followed the same path. It has been very cathartic, but unfortunately it has also had some horrible, unintended side effects.
So, now I’m full of plans. I’m champing at the bit to apply for one of these doctoral programmes. I’m thinking of linking to IBBY or Seven Stories. Any interest out there in getting a funded Ph D linked to one of those?
It was no surprise, then, that when news of the Famine reached Boston in November 1845, the society responded rapidly, with a former president, Rev Thomas J O Flaherty, establishing a charitable fund which within weeks raised $19,000 — a significant sum then.
It was this single document, signed and sworn by two honourable and upstanding ladies which verified Obama’s eligibility and which was used for the purposes of electing him as president.
~ Suchi Govindarajan works as a technical writer. In her spare time, she does freelance writing and editing work and also volunteers with the Spastics Society of Karnataka. Readers can follow her on twitter: @suchiswriting
That’s where mother’s instinct comes in. Erin watched Abby carefully the next morning, and she didn’t like the way she was favouring her right hand. When she asked Abby about her left, Abby merely said that it was “sore” and continued playing happily. While I couldn’t see anything wrong, she knew better, and convinced me that we needed to visit urgent care.
I wish to be remembered
8x10 oil on sketchbook paper nfs
5. Engel - His coming out and coming to terms with all that entails is a work in progress that I follow with great interest.
Repeatedly denied access to the notorious facility, Dr. Arcos, intent on exposing the clinic's wrongdoings, needs to find a trustworthy witness, one who will uncover the veil of wickedness that hangs over the place, and put an end to Greta's reign of terror once and for all. And the witness he's been looking for literally lands in the backseat of the doctor's car. Her name is Abbie Phillips (Tania Busselier), and she's the sister of Rosa Phillips. Determined to find out what happened to her sister, Abbie allows Dr. Acros to have her committed to Las Palomas under an assumed name.
This is such a gorgeous set and surprisingly very easy to stamp each step!! It is perfect for Mother’s Day for sure! (If my mom was still with me, this would be the card I give because Iris is her favorite flower).
This is the meaning of the Word Confidence
Remember how we told you to keep in mind the comment from the NASA graph about the Industrial Revolution? Keep in mind that CO2 is but one of the smallest players in global temps and global temps do not always follow CO2 levels. The sun has a much larger impact than man made CO2 and global temps often, but do not always follow solar output cycles. This shows that there are many factors that affect global temperatures.
What I liked: The voice. Ms Brennan has an amazing, quirky, peculiar voice in the novel. All the characters' wits are quick, and it makes for a very funny read. Kami was adorable and definitely likable. I felt like -- despite her being a teenager with an imaginary friend -- that I would have been friends with this girl in high school. She was raised by loving parents who are present in this book, and through that her independence and self-sufficiency were grown and very apparent.
Halton police Detective Steve Skerrett said the group was part of a larger number of protesters who moved onto the property after a peaceful demonstration to seek a meeting with Wescam officials. Skerrett did not have names of those arrested.
* University of Minnesota - Twin Cities (USA)
-Book reviews! Some of these deal directly with classic cinema, others just suit my fancy but I think y’all will enjoy them all the same.
that really doesn't get along,
For those of you in the intellectual property world, IPKat needs no introduction, but the team’s More Monday Miscellany is worth a read to keep you on the money. “They thought it was a bicycle — but it was just a great ruse for importing Bauhaus chairs across the Italy-Germany border” I liked the graphic.
What that? You seen this before, so where am I going with all this back slapping? Glad you asked.
Cache-A Corporation provides archive appliances serving the digital video industry. Our products are targeted at the idea of archiving made easy, serving workflows for production, postproduction and broadcast applications. We deliver solutions that keep track of your assets with a built-in, searchable database of all of your tapes while also allowing you to interchange your content by giving every tape its own table of contents.
It also bodes well for the fortunes of the site (I hope) - the trip to Amsterdam were in the company of magazines and websites that I like to think off as ‘higher’ up the proverbial ladder. It’s not that healthy to think of one’s site in terms like that, but there are certain realities that many of my colleagues can understand – some sites, either by connections or raw “we’ve got more traffic than you”, get priority treatment over others. With everyone and their mum opening a videogames website, it’s expected, so it’s alright. Anyway, this marks the first time though we’ve been invited to a press preview overseas for a single game. It felt good, and it was a good trip – can’t really talk about what I saw or anything like that until Friday though, so perhaps I’ll do another blog post at the end of the week.
Dani Plassitz is making heads turn in SL with Mirette. The gown comes with three skirts, two tops and two gloves, so you may chose your version of how to wear it. You can add a little extra glitz or tone it down a bit. But no matter how you wear Mirette, you will be gorgeous!
Combine banana, oil and water in a bowl.
I've had my fitbit for over a week now and I have to tell you that I am thrilled with it. I haven't used it as much as possible this week because of going back to work and trying to stick with my new plan. I really only had enough time to wear my fitbit and try to learn all of it's benefits.
I sliced the tip of my left index finger (*shaking my fist at that cucumber!*) so it is interesting trying to type today. I never have knife accidents, and yet, on this juice feast it has happened TWICE in the last 37 days--and both times, it was a stinking cucumber I was slicing. Clearly proof that they are evil. Or that I am clumsy. Nah!
Bad for us, but good for her boyfriend, you’d think. Owen Moore plays Dennis as a flightly Euro playboy with a one-track mind. Given the way Tina flirts with him upon first meet, and the rather slim pickings (not an apt description at all, actually) surrounding him, Dennis’ disinterest in her is strange. “Wheat-Tine! We ought to get together for breakfast!” he quips, one of many cringe-worthy intertitles you’ll endure in this film. He has little else to add.
19:00 – 20:30 The Dirty Words
2. Concentration – maintain attention on a subject without emotion and distracting thoughts
This goat represents Alexander the Great, who led the armies of Greece.
Return to RHS: 5:30
Who ever has the hearts hanging on their bedroom
elementary, my dear Watson.
This is/was single-handedly the most difficult thing I’ve ever done. Physically that is, because when you have a brain like me, mental challenges exist hourly. I started sweating the moment I walked into our death chamber, I mean studio. Gaining a good position is sort of like the lawn chair game at the pool of hotels, you’ve got to get there early. First come first serve.
For my present
02.183 YUSUFALI: O ye who believe! Fasting is prescribed to you as it was prescribed to those before you, that ye may (learn) self-restraint,-
Lizabeth Vineyard Harvest
This may not chime with everyone’s experience, but I’m just reporting what I’ve encountered. It seems that regular pubgoing is becoming no longer socially acceptable.
But what if you had no protective father, and weren’t listening to your own instincts—or what if you just crossed paths with a psychopath or a serial killer or a genocidal maniac? It happens. What if you were born in Cambodia and grew up under Pol Pot, as one of my clients did, or any other version of innocence in captivity to obvious evil? When there has been serious, life-threatening trauma or loss involved, the requirement that you must forgive in order to heal is just another shocking assault, a violation of whatever safety you have achieved.
I've never sewn with oilcloth and wasn't sure how much fabric I'd need for the project, so I thought I'd give the DIY kit a try.
Lilah is starting kindergarten. I can hardly wrap my head around it – kindergarten. She stopped being a baby when I wasn’t looking, apparently.
the Act of 1871.
Peachy Keen Stamps, and one way we can do that is from feedback from our friends!
You might have seen the sentences placed on the ground
Thanks for visiting! Happy stitching, and stay cool!
so yesterday, after spending much too long browsing other people's iphone cases, i made a rash decision and opened up a store of my own on society 6.
The crime: Beunka Adams tells his story
A few weeks ago I recently got onto the blogger website and wanted to look up an old friend’s blogger site. I went back and started reading some of the older entries and I was laughing so hard at some of the stuff he entered. Most of the stuff I was involved in and it was amazed how just reading those entries brought back so many memories.
Your Reader's Choice Suggestions
“It’s time to implement our sanctions laws and demonstrate to Russia and China that there are consequences for abetting Tehran and flouting US sanctions,” Representative Ileana Ros-Lehtinen said in a statement.
Now I don’t normally read the Mirror as it’s a comic not a newspaper, but I have heard a lot of City fans complain about its in-built anti City reporters and I have seen some uncalled for bile on their website in the past, but this for me takes the biscuit. This isn’t reportage it’s petty and pathetic and the reporters (for it is more than one) need to get a life.
Suneet Singh Tuli, CEO, Datawind said, “We are very happy to have formed this strategic partnership with Reverie for supply of language solutions. We feel strongly that technology should reach every corner of the world and knowledge of English should not be a barrier. This language solution will benefit the users by offering a new world of services and products to a segment of world population that has been ignored for so long.”
So here I am on a feel-good high about paying for something I rightfully owed him for (haha...) and I stumble across another reminder about the scholarship drive for Brian's cousin who passed away earlier this year.
I wrote two posts about my "family of origin"
Dave Thibodeau, Ska's president and co-founder, leads a brewery that has rode a wave of mushrooming sales of craft cans. "There are very trace amounts of BPA in the liner of the can," he said in an email. "The levels are far less than that of steel cans and also way below what the FDA says is safe."
According to Richard Gottlieb, MSW and Diplomate with a capital D, last year at the Empathic Therapy Conference Dr. Peter Breggin said, “If you haven’t been fired at least once, you’re not doing your job.”
And I love living in a small town, because while at the hospital, the 5-year-old's kindergarten teacher called to see if we would still be in the hospital when she passed by on her way home, because she wanted to come visit. Unfortunately, we were about to be discharged. While we waited, another friend called to let me know he had heard what had happened and to see if there was anything he could do. These little gestures completely warmed my heart and made me want to be a better person. And upon arriving home, the 5-year-old boy was presented by his 6th-grade brother a poster his class had put together at school. In the center of the poster in block letters were the words "GET WELL SOON!" and surrounding that were sweet notes from each student in the class. Intermittently taped between the messages were pieces of wrapped hard candy and chocolate! It was adorable!
anyways because of the trailer, this game has officially landed on my to buy list when it releases in September...i mean anything that has that dramatic of a preview can't be horrible bad...right????
My ultimate intention is to reach out to everyone who works in the creative world (marketing, design, fashion, music, film, TV, art, media, communications …) and provide a space to help co-create what ever it is that you want.
The Poems:
reminded us to seek joy
The Terms of Use state that MySpace shall be taking a limited license from the users to facilitate uploading and hosting of the work. While SCIL argued this was not authorised, MySpace argued that this was merely a precautionary step to avoid any objection from any users of the defendants and that such a license is not
still and thoughtful,
This is a somewhat unpolished, meandering piece that comes out of some serious thinking I’ve been doing lately about the implications of my own research for current gay male culture and queer politics generally. Apologies for the disjointed and wandering nature of my writing here; I hope that the ideas come through despite that.
Cut one of the small onions in half. Place one half in the bottom of a medium stockpot, and add 3 C. water, 1 t. salt, 1.2 t. minced garlic (or 1 garlic clove, cut in half) and chicken breasts. Cover and bring to a boil over medium-high heat. Simmer 25-30 minutes or until chicken is cooked through. Remove chicken, but reserve stock for later. Cool the chicken and shred.
Many wonder today why the Republican party does nothing to defeat the treasonous schemes of the Democrats. It is because the pope's Jesuits have thoroughly infiltrated the Republican party as well as the Democratic party.
The EDL which let's be honest are nothing more than a bunch of skin headed football hooligans and pub racists that evolved to have a show of hands to elect someone to make a Facebook page are the current go to racists. Every now and then a gibbering cliché turns up on Newsnight and Paxo sits back and lets him sprout his bollocks. Paxo realises that you can't argue with a racist because the people watching at home are either racist or not racist and this acts as a social barometer for the folk sat at home. If you agree with the man and think he's talking a lot of sense then you are a racist. If you don't agree with a word he is saying then you are not a racist. If you are watching it laughing your head off or enraged that the BBC has given this man a platform then you are probably not a racist.
Yesterday I went to Lancaster on the train. It was over 30 minutes late, and it was only a 9 minute journey. That journey cost me £3.10 single, it would have been 10p more return. If only my van used 8 gallons of fuel to London but only a pint to get home.
Now comes the fun part (and yes, I got brown Sharpie on my finger ... it's unavoidable).
These are a few profiles I did for my games based on the existing ones. The formula is pretty easy to work out and they have worked well in play too. Take into account I play Middle-earth games with these rules.
OK, Timeshift said no to the documentary on my new book that was pitched to them. But don't hold that against them. Watch the show, with a bottle of something good.
and it looks like lilacs
"I've been waiting for things to settle down so I could get some rest. It hasn't worked out that way," says Ben, who still works full-time for Viking Yachts in Bass River. He brewed the three inaugural ales over four sessions (two batches of red rye ale), sometimes working until 4 or 5 a.m.
Quin- You better get in that bedroom pick that room up or I am going to wear your bottom out with a big big big big big gigantic paddle.
Just you… and me… and my mom.
By evening most people are downshifting, except for the late-night geniuses who hit their creative stride from 11 p.m. to 1 a.m.
The ARISE Positivity Cards App is a unique way of saying; you’ve been noticed doing something good, I’m sorry, thank you, I apologize, please forgive me, you are so appreciated and many more similar messages. This unique app is great for self-improvement and as a communication tool with friends, family and business associates. ARISE Positivity Cards App owners will have a lifetime supply of the right words and sentiments at their fingertips. There are four different ways to scroll through the “deck” of ARISE Positivity Cards. Searches can be narrowed by selecting from the following themes:
I bought a CPU as soon as we moved here, but the power has been very reliable. Nvertheless, I am looking into generators, just in case...Better safe than sorry!!!
Kostya looked to the sky. The Earth, a blue sphere, hung in the cosmos. He was alone. Only the crackle of a dead radio filled the silence of space.
There are a few very light, gassy Japanese beers like Suntory that are frequently available in China, but these lack any significant character. There was one dark Chinese beer I could find in just a few shops which was called, appropriately enough "Dark Beer". One dimensional, a slight molasses note, no malt character at all--it was like mediocre homebrew. There are three Chinese beers that I could get consistently: Harbin, Yanjing, and Tsingtao. All three are pilsner style lagers, very pale and highly effervescent. The Harbin is the least notable of the three--the hop bittering is subdued and there is not much malt character either. I had it once and didn't bother with it again. Yanjing, particularly popular in Beijing (that city's native brew, I understand), is better, but nothing really to write about.
Besides the success inherent through the numbers, it was the turnout of support from the communities themselves which greatly calls for celebration and acknowledgement.
he's not ready not to nap. no sir. he needs a nap, this i know because when he naps, he naps long and hard. but lately there are days when i really cannot get him down, try as i might.
Thinks their DNA is why he/she are found in another umm seat.
For an example, here’s some of the open ended and undirected play I just happened to notice (when I glanced in his direction) Mr Butterfly (two and a half-years old) involved in over a period of about three hours on Saturday morning:
9 p.m. – 11:30 p.m. (Finals)
The suit, which intensifies the battle over hugely popular online video viewing in China, said the claims by Tudou caused Youku’s share price and advertising revenue to decline, and raised concerns among investors and the US Securities and Exchange …
Rating: * (out of 5)
He reaches his hand to wipe my tears and I move back but my back already stuck on the wall. I even can’t bear his touch. It makes me afraid. Even his touch makes me think about their touch. How can I accept his feeling if I can’t be touched?
Anyone who's been following my blog for a while will know that I have a mild obsession with Venice Lol.
I'm not stupid or so incredibly isolated to not know the benefits of exercise. Unfortunately, for whatever reason, I started denying myself the permission to pursue physical activity as a lifestyle. Whether it be pregnancy, the exhaustion of nurturing a newborn, the strained finances of a one-income family or the general impossibility of going outside of my house by myself, I couldn't justify the time, energy or resources that were required for me to pursue an active lifestyle. I felt guilty leaving Michael with the kids so I could go to the gym because it meant that I couldn't spend time with him during the few waking hours he could be with us, I felt guilty about spending money on anything outside of food, shelter and clothing (which anxiety would build up until I snapped and purchased a ton of yarn...go figure), and the start-up of any physical endeavor saw me pushing myself too hard too fast which sapped me of the necessary energy I required to make it through my days with my young children.
People's Aberrant Amber (American ESB)
Google has still not made much headway into the enterprise – in spite of changing direction in many ways.
Me: But do you have a Wii to sale?
What the hell was that? Maybe I missed the part when you said, “Sorry. Nakainom lang.” I can only guess. But what the hell was that? An attempt to flip me over? I didn’t want to take it seriously because I’m afraid I might believe it and give in to what was stagnated for four years. But damn was I so bad that I kept my hopes up – until the next morning.
ETA2: Corner Club Press will be hosting my story, "The Husband," in their next issue and "Take Her By The Heel" will appear at NONTRUE in February. Okay, I'm seriously done bragging now. :)
The 2a.m. burrito. The white pants on the 27th day of your cycle. The devil-may care way you said "We won't run out of gas before we get home....." The Boston fern over the bathtub. The cartwheel on the wet driveway. Saying yes to the first guy who asked you to the prom even though he wasn't your first choice.
Well, I wouldn’t say I have writerly superstitions or odd rituals exactly (I feel so boring!) but I will say that since my mum passed away in 2004, I feel her presence more and more—which may seem ironic to some. The closer the launch date gets, the more I feel like she is with me.
Summer must be just around the corner. Do you know how I can tell? Because suddenly I am receiving emails from left, right and centre from friends, acquaintances and people who once sat on a bus next to someone who might have known me, asking for travel tips for their upcoming visit to Paris.
The poem about the footprints tells the story of everyone’s life, and not just the author’s. He is with us always. Even when we do not recognize that fact, He is there, and many times it is He who carries us through the toughest parts of our lives.
Hope you like it!! Have a fab day!
To top it off, February 4th marks a year from my last
I will be starting a new job come the 14th, and I am also trying to get a part-time job for just the Summer months. The process is slow, of course, but I already have one interview lined up for next week.
I don’t know if it is my body’s reaction to the anesthesia or other chemicals it has been recently pumped with, but I do believe in healing from the inside out. Don’t be surprised if you see me juicing my meals- gotta get those rich nutrients one way or another.
Because of the new and redefined categories of circulation on this FAS-FAX report, ABC recommends not making any direct comparisons of March 2011 data to prior audit periods. The 2010 and 2011 data will be presented in two separate sections in the March 2011 FAS-FAX report.
Cory Celaya
But there's a catch. And it's a big one, especially for me. This miracle drug will help only 4% of those with Cystic Fibrosis. And Bennett is not in that 4%.
Most of the home is located underground, featuring an earthen roof that perfectly emulates the hills around it, with the glass front facing the bay (the only hint that there’s a home hidden somewhere below). Like a Hobbit hole of contemporary experimental architecture, the Malator was designed and built in 1998 by avant-garde architectural firm Future Systems, now known as Amanda Levete Architects after a company split in 2008.
LaKesha
"... religious freedom ... cuts both ways. Just as those faith groups who do not want to conduct same sex marriages should have the freedom not to do so, I do not believe that should be at the expense of those who wish to conduct such ceremonies."
I also made a patchwork heart on the spur of the moment the other day. Lots of people have suggested that while I'm laid up with the cast on my leg that I should do more creative things, which I can see makes sense! Though I always struggle to make when I'm not happy so what with everything that's going on at the moment it has been a bit of a mental challenge. I am pleased with this though, and I think I will use it for a Facebook pay it forward that I signed up to months ago that needs to be completed this year.
I turned back to my brother and he said, “Closer.”
Been a year now and he’s still there
One would wonder, what type of trouble could a pistol-carrying, elderly woman, possibly get herself in that would land her in all places, JAIL!! Well, let’s just say, after yet another run-in with the “po-po’s,” Madea has exhausted all of her life-lines, tap-danced on the wrong judge’s nerves and ends up serving time in jail.
I know that my parents worried about my safety because they talked to me explicitly about it. The parameters for safety were always spelled out for me. When I was old enough to understand why, my mother gave me a small plastic box that emitted a piercing whistle at the press of a button. Even as my curfew was pushed back later and later, she always waited up for me. I know now that a part of her must have held its breath every time I walked out the door.
It’s great , give it a try and see. Here is the topic ~
Wow, can you believe we are creeping up to the end of September already? Goodness gracious! With the end of a month, a new one brings more challenges and a special call out! (hint hint) Stay tuned for more details on this fun announcement! And don't forget, each weekly challenge brings the opportunity for a crafter to debut the following week's theme with the Bar-Tenders, AND every first challenge of the month is now sponsored!
-break off the long tendril-y root tip. It’s too fibrous to enjoy.
In the city’s melted furnace, unexpectedly we watched
other things to consider: therapy, medication, yoga, meditation, self-help books and seminars. it doesn’t have to be costly: check out youtube for some seriously inspiring lectures. therapy doesn’t have to involve a shrink: it may be buying a box of crayola crayons and coloring outside the lines. sound silly? take it from a silly gal that’s been there: it can work.
HOMEMADE BREAD
Gospel humility is not needing to think about myself. Not needing to connect things with myself. It is an end to thoughts such as, “I’m in this room with these people, does that make me look good? Do I want to be here?” True gospel-humility means I stop connecting every experience, every conversation, with myself. In fact, I stop thinking about myself.
We declined to donate money to Lambeau Field, even though TurboTax asked us nicely.
I kept those things that I that would remind me of her on a daily basis and some items I thought would be lovely mixed in with a more modern decor.
I guess I've failed to write it up thus far because I've only developed my addiction to it this year. The first few times I tried it, I wasn't knocked out by it. I think that's because I'd been accustomed to the punch-you-in-the-mouth overload of hops that you get with some other IPAs, most notably the Dogfish Head takes on the India Pale Ale style. For this same reason, I had also dismissed Sierra Nevada's seasonal IPA as well. But as I worked my way through a six-pack of the Sierra, I began to appreciate the more subtle hop approach. I then took this frame of mind into a reassessment of the Elissa, and I dare say this is becoming my very favorite beer right now.
The problem is, its all rubbish to the Nth degree. Outside of the fact that the Chinese, Soviet Union (us Russians), British, French, Belgians, Netherlanders, Australians, IndoChinese, Indians and others were fighting the Japanese long before the Americans got into the war, the whole causation of events is pure nonsense as well.
25gr dark chocolate - roughly chopped
all the way to Egypt."
If you decide to have a saint drawn for you or your family, would you leave me a comment? I will put you on my pray list and then would you do the same?
One thing I don't miss about my exFundagelical days is, believe it or not, believing that 'there is no such thing as a coincidence.' It is mentally exhausting to be brought up in a culture that reads into patterns and number combinations and mundane events as Secret Signs of the Times and Coded Messages from the Spiritual Warfare Front.
BRIT: "In the village lived a man called Smith..."
"We believed it was essential to the security of the operation and our personnel," he said. "In fact, only a very small group of people inside our own government knew of this operation in advance." Shortly after the raid, he added, U.S. officials contacted senior Pakistani leaders and told them about the raid and its results.
those we find around us.
Editorial
Bible – Our lessons were on “We Must Know the Way” and “We Must Believe that Jesus Is Our Saviour.” We read John 14:1-6 and Acts 16:25-34.
This latest moolie has a problem, too.
I don’t feel lonely anymore. I think I understand this, but it is still surprises me. Now that I’m not looking for approval and attention, I am totally content to just be me. (What?? Seriously?? Yes, it has surprised me too)
We will start the class by preparing background signatures for the books using paints, inks, stencils, gesso, stamping, collage and texture. We will then start to cut various apertures, before strengthening the signatures with sticky back canvas and adding to an accordion fold spine. The addition of mini pages, tags, flaps and doodling is followed by a decorated canvas cover. Bring cutting mat, Xacto knife, scissors and adhesive. ($90)
All in all it was a pretty good morning's work, topped off by a lovely post-race cooked breakfast provided at short notice by Zoe's friends Jo and Graham.
After we got back to Tokushima we met Joel and Mari so I could introduce them to Kathy. Sat in a coffee shop and chatted for a while, then we picked up some dinner to take home. We are both very tired. It’s time to get my futon out and go to bed – we have an early morning as we start our trip to Kyoto.
The New York Times profile today of Roger Green, From Conviction to Re-election and Beyond, omits mention of Atlantic Yards, but it also glosses over a significant dispute about the State Assembly's transparency, since the Ethics Committee has not made public the secret report it produced. The article states:
Blog Action Day is an annual event held every October 15 that unites the world’s bloggers in posting about the same issue on the same day with the aim of sparking discussion around an issue of global importance. Blog Action Day 2009 will be one of the largest-ever social change events on the web.
Mom ~
While the area around the Barclays Center is changing, and there's significant retail demand for open spaces, what struck me last night as I walked Flatbush Avenue is how much more change there will be.
These men do not just walk up to their opponents. Nay. They strut. These men are no shrinking violets. Never. They make fish faces at the heaving beast while waving a giant red banner in its face.
Today, with the advent of digital distribution, an author can distribute her works 100% as effectively as any publishing conglomerate. In digital distribution, authors and legacy publishers stand on an entirely level playing field -- which is another way of saying that in digital, an author simply doesn't need a publisher to distribute. So what legacy publishers are saying to authors today -- the new legacy publishing value proposition -- is this: "Before, when we handled distribution plus, we charged you 85%. Now you don't need us for distribution anymore, and we're only going to handle the plus part -- and you'll still have to pay us the same 85%."
So I’m going to speak today about passions. Why passions? It’s pretty simple, really – for me, unschooling is a bit like a tree. It starts with a seed of consciously choosing a better life for you and your family, and grows into something absolutely beautiful and unique, sometimes unwieldy, rarely predictable. And like all trees, it needs roots. I think that passions are the very root of unschooling. You know, there are many “definitions” for unschooling, but personally I think definitions are a bit limiting and rule-bound. So I try to think of unschooling in terms of principles. The simplest, most concise statement of unschooling principles is one I am lifting straight from Joyce Fetterroll: humans are born learners. Children will learn best when given the freedom to learn what, when and how they want.
Feeling muddled and overwhelmed with work drove me to take action. OK, my to-do list ran to three pages but it was down on paper and out of my head, which consequently felt a lot clearer. I noted the day that each item needed to be completed by and worked through them in priority order rather than switching backwards and forwards between tasks in a state of panic. As a result, I felt more in control and a lot less anxious that I was going to overlook something important.
Our friends over at Wiki had this to say about their origin: “TV tray tables became popular in the 1950s as a way to hold food and beverage items while watching TV, the iconic item being a TV dinner. National advertising for TV tray tables first appeared in 1952, a full year before Swanson introduced the TV dinner in October 1953.” Tray tables are portable, easy to use, quickly tucked away, and the perfect solution to needing just a bit of tabletop whenever you need it.
Afterwards, Gibbs is described cutting off one of the man’s little fingers and removing a tooth.
Surely after all these years and all the evidence about the lies and scams of so-called mainstream science, only main stream scientists can still believe in main stream science. If they don't lie in their research to sell the medicines of big pharma, they lie to sell the money-making ideas of politicians, economists and bankers and guess who markets their lies? Main stream Media of course ..... as always.
- 1 cup (240 ml) (230 gm) rendered chicken fat, duck fat, or canola oil
But then, this evening, Dexter and I went to a memorial service at my school. One of the speakers was a freshman, the daughter of one of the people killed on that day. Lots of students--many more than I thought--showed up to listen and sing and pray, and dedicate a tree in memory of the loved ones lost. The chaplain and the president told of inspiring service projects, some created by students or alumni in memory of those loved ones: houses repaired, a school for girls built in Afghanistan.
their bright colors will soon be hidden
Political Debt Ceiling Showdown Recap July 6-18, 2011: Bipartisan Senate Compromise Plan Emerges — Obama Sets New Deadline for Friday July 22, 2011 — History Musings, 7-18-11
Physically I continue to progress. Walking with a cane only, and at home, having permission from the therapist to walk without a cane. This is going well.
But it doesn't seem quite right that punk rockers should still be performing when they are looking at age 40 in the rear-view mirror. The classic fate of a punk rocker is to live fast and die young, whether from a heroin overdose (like Sid Vicious of the Sex Pistols) or from asphyxiating on someone else's vomit (like Eric Childs of Spinal Tap).
Just joking--don't.
Good news: The best wok, carbon steel, sometimes called rolled steel, also happens to be the least expensive. Carbon steel will rust so you have to season it and take proper care of it. However, it is light weight, will take on a black patina over time and nothing will stick to it. Cast iron is too heavy to maneuver and will interact with acetic ingredients. Stainless steel, also heavy, will be more expensive. An electric wok is out of the question as you cannot take food quickly off the heat or manipulate the wok.
“I don’t think so.”
Let’s just take the case of a single well-known and important jihadist who began his work many years before 2001. Omar Bakri Mohammed, a jihadist who was born in Syria, arrived in the UK fifteen years ago – in 1986. He ended up in the UK because he’d been expelled from Saudi Arabia. In no time at all, he set up the extreme Islamist group, Hizb ut-Tahrir (rather, he set up the first UK branch of that group).
For my gas station sign, the red panel is just red CS cut with a Spellbinders die and then coated with Rock Candy Distress Crackle Paint. When dry, I went over it with Vintage Photo Distress Stain to accent the crackle. For the top white piece, I cut 3 thin pieces of chipboard and glued them together and then painted them with Picket Fence Distress Crackle paint. When dry, I stamped the image with Jet Black Archival Ink. The Diesel Punk sentiment was stamped on white CS cut with the Tim Holtz Tattered Banners die.
No one wants to laugh at a disability. That’s ghetto. But I had a kid in a wheelchair behave in a very rude fashion to me, and it made me wonder if they don’t want to laugh about it every once in a while.
In the late 1800’s, in the Black Mountains of Mohave County, Arizona, and near where the current town of Oatman is located, Olive Oatman was rescued from the Mohave Indians who acquired her in a trade from the Apache. In honor or this brave girl, the town was named after her. The town started as a small mining camp with a few tents scattered about. In 1915, two miners struck it rich with a gold vein worth around 10 million dollars. Within a year, the word got out and Oatman’s population hit over 3,500 people.
Soft Cell Tainted love UK
Mussolini entered parliament. Shortly afterward, he marched on Rome with his Black Shirts. The communists also sit in the Reichstag. No one is naive enough to believe that they want to work seriously and positively. One more thing: If we do not succeed in making our dangerous men immune to legal prosecution, they will all find themselves behind bars sooner or later. Will that happen if they possess parliamentary immunity? Certainly. When democracy is near its end it will resort openly to the terror of capitalistic dictatorship that it ordinarily uses covertly. But that will not happen for some time, and in the meanwhile the fighters for our faith will enjoy parliamentary immunity long enough to broaden our fighting front such that shutting them up will not be as easy as democracy would like it to be.
My hair is natural, and has been for about 15 years, but many black people process their hair. They use a chemical, affectionally known as straightener, that makes the hair straight. It also looks much longer, because natural black hair has a lot of kinks. And naturally black hair curls on it's own, getting shorter/longer with the weather and if you wash it.
And surprisingly a lot of my friends thought it would be a fun idea...
It seems like an hour ago
Kresson, a Pittsburgh-based surveillance expert said a secret meeting could be compromised, because of the spyware installed on a phone, allowing a third party to hear and record everything that’s said, without anyone else knowing. Sending a text message causes the hidden software to activate the phone’s microphone.
The day shone mildly, warming the winding cobblestone path as she moved her bare feet slowly across the ground. The garden ran over with life, bright green, transparent leaves clustered with fat, colorful fruit, dragging down the supple branches. The world was beautiful, trapped in an eternal spring, each tree and bush delightfully scenic and tasteful in their own place. Oholibah smiled.
After one has taken in all the occasional squalls, cleared the storm drains between them, made sure the water levels didn't seep into the floor of one's car, taken the pets out despite their unwillingness to put one dainty paw on a wet sidewalk in order to relieve themselves, and marveled at the fact that the power is still on, what is there left to do but hunker down and stave off ennui as best one can? So, we cleaned house. We played computer games and board games and card games. We got more than our fill of crap teevee-watching in (and I of my own guilty pleasure through reruns online) between monitoring the meteorologist freak-outs on the local news. We cooked and baked. We read and napped. We had to make it a point to leave the house at least once a day, which usually turned out to be at breakfast. I've never seen local breakfast places so devoid of 20-30 minute waits on weekend mornings as I have this past weekend. People got shocked over the past few days, and local businesses suffered, resorting to some desperation on their part to keep customers coming. Not that I blame them. This time of year isn't normally a bad time for retail, but Lee messed with everyone's best-laid plans, including ours to venture out to the beach. Closest we got to that was the aquarium and the Algiers ferry.
“Good. Evil. In the end it is all the same thing. Light and shadow. It is in between where the truth lies. You must see through the illusion. See through the lie.”
Patients were left fuming after returning from appointments to discover their transport home had been immobilized for staying in bays too long.
Ok now on to the "funny story" that I had mentioned earlier in this post. Well, the ladies at RASC were throwing a little raffle. And for some reason, I felt that I was gonna be a lucky little gal that night. So at 8pm, they draw out 3 names from a jar...and lo & behold, the 2nd name they call out is me!!! Yippee!!! So I get up to grab my prize, which is all wrapped up in white with ribbon. I knew it was a book, but why I didn't put "two & two" together to realize that I had won the NEW book, "Shabby Chic Inspirations," - I won't really know...a little too much bubbly, perhaps? Nah, I didn't even have half a paper cups worth! lol
At the shelter, there are a few paid workers and a few volunteers that put in time from their own private schedule to come and aid the animals.
...and I'll simply wake up and find myself among my people; a free people living the good life, without any of the current stupid shit such as cars, cities, nuclear waste, shopping malls, suburbs, vast fields of monocrops, enslavement of animals and plant life, mass extermination of species, paved roads, agriculture, hierarchy, and all that shit, or civilization as it's also known...this can't be real, can it!!?
This is a question that Jake has to face. It’s evil to kill and eat people – unquestionably – and yet he chooses to continue doing it. He tries to salve his conscience with humanitarian giving (hell, he probably buys carbon offsets) but is that enough? For practical reasons, though, he never sends any money to the families of those he murders. Why has he never seriously considered suicide? Would that not be the right thing to do?
Yesterday’s sandwich, the #1 at Saigon Vietnamese Sandwich Deli, left me unsettled. My understanding of the sandwich world had not been overturned, but it had certainly been jostled. Immediately after finishing at Saigon Vietnamese, I walked the 500 feet to Bánh Mì Saigon. All that had been jostled, I thought, would soon be set still. All questions would be answered, all doubts banished. Bánh Mì Saigon was packed. It was getting late in the afternoon, and I took such a crowd as a bit of confirmation, an unspoken collusion between me and all of these other people who knew good sandwiches from great sandwiches from very good, and greatest from great. There was a healthy line, and a small crowd who had already ordered stood waiting for their sandwiches. I spent a few minutes in line, then stepped to the counter and made my order. As I reached for my wallet I was shocked to see my order ready to be taken away. I glanced behind me at the assembled crowd, and questioned whether this was really my sandwich. I was assured it was, money was exchanged, and I went on my way. The picture you see above is the glamour shot, from previous visits. As I held the sandwich that day:
What IS the "T" in Russell T Davies, by the way?
I understand how Amanda Craig must have felt at Bedales, but I also understand how others may have formed a completely different view of what happened. Their experience was different from Amanda's. They may not have been bullied by that gang who went after her. Or maybe, just like the girl I knew, they were more tough.
---Want to participate? Grab the logo, post your own WoW entry on your blog, and leave a link in the comments section!
The next day we continued on the Great Ocean Road and headed west. We stopped to see some koalas, snapped pictures in Apollo Bay, hiked in Mait’s Rest rain forrest, and finally made it to the 12 Apostles. The 12 Apostles are limestone stacks off the shore; the entire expanse of the shore is actually part of Port Campbell National Park. The apostles were formed by thousands of years of erosion and while there are not actually 12 (there never were and now there are 8 since once collapsed in 2005) it was one of the most magnificent views I have ever seen. After taking in the beauty we also headed a littler farther west and saw another coastal formation called Loch Ard Gorge. The impressive ombré colored stone formations set against the topaz blue water was striking.
For a while I was leaning towards the Chronicles of Prydain, Lloyd Alexander’s Welsh-myth-inspired adventure tales. These are the books that I recommended to friends who could not stomach the length and verbosity of Tolkien. In fact, I think I used to refer to them as “Lord of the Rings for Dummies”. But in the end, I had to play the “which series would you bring to a desert island” game, and came to the conclusion Prydain would not give me enough witty word play, expanding and mature world views, or a large enough collection of books. (Is it sad that part of my criteria is how many book there are in the series? Five is just too few!)
She often runs what she calls 'tours' in Wiltshire where she lives and in Lincolnshire where she grew up. For locations shoots that I arrange I spend many hours looking for potential sites, and coming up with contingency plans. For a Madame Bink tour I just turn up with camera and car, and she guides us around a variety of super locations she knows. So last July off I went up to Lincolnshire.
Because the egg wash helps the bread stick together when you roll it up, after adding the sugar. Butter is more like a barrier and this leaves gaps in the dough that show up when sliced. You can use butter if you want, as long as the raisins are integrated into the dough already and can’t fall out. Then holes aren’t as important.
So let's say you are Singer (which is currently owned by SVP Worldwide, which also owns Pfaff and Husqvarna Viking, which is in turn owned by Kohlberg and Company, which bought Singer in 2004). Given the enormous and (arguably) growing popularity of the original Featherweight model, what would you do? You might try to restore the nameplate (think Ford Mustang), and Singer has done just that, numerous times. The results? Generic plastic zigzaggers.
"Dan Krokos's debut FALSE MEMORY, featuring a girl with no memory who discovers she's a genetically altered weapon of mass destruction and must uncover the truth of her identity in order to save her city, to Catherine Onder at Disney-Hyperion, in a significant deal, at auction, in a three-book deal, by Suzie Townsend at FinePrint Literary Management on behalf of Janet Reid at FinePrint Literary Management (World English)."
400 Studio type condo units. unit area ranges from 28 square meters to 66 square meters. This condo building is 33 stories high including one (1) floor commerical spaces, three (3) floors for parking spaces and the condo units from 3rd floor to 33rd floor.
It’s a small line that comes back in a huge manner a few moments later. Kirk and McCoy find Commodore Decker in a post-traumatic fog and they have to force his mind into the present. Decker tells them that he beamed the crew down to the third planet. Kirk tells him, “There is no third planet,” and Decker wails, “Don’t you think I know that? There was, but not anymore!”
Pakistan’s National Assembly has unanimously passed a bill to establish an independent human rights institution (NHRI) with wide judicial powers.
To actually 'finish the journey' for a year has been very rewarding. All our 'Sunshine Blankets' have been 'very well' received by the Staff and the Residents in Nursing Homes. To actually meet some of the Residents while our Blankets have been presented to them has just put wonderful. I personally know that they love them and they appreciate them.
Longest Run: 10 miles
Cinebench: 17926
While I was working on the project, the UPS man came and delivered a package I had been waiting on from the Container Store. It was my new wall file!
The next generation is all about connectivity. This sprouts way beyond posting achievements and trophies to Facebook. EA is at the head of this movement, connecting all their games to an “online universe“. This was exemplified in Mass Effect 3, which had mobile games and applications affect the console experience. As mentioned in my previous article, Nintendo is very resistant to the notion of mobile development. In essence, this would be aiding the enemy.
"Yes, I do," I said. I handed the man a twenty dollar bill and pointed to a table at the far end of the room, where Gardner Dozois was hobnobbing with the movers and shakers of the field. "I want you to go over to my friend at that table and play Lady of Spain."
Surprise!: LT, Jonathan Martin
After a great introduction to my first-ever Washington state Wine, I am again heading back to the great Pacific Northwest to tackle the Red Diamond Merlot 2009.
I am a good cook. I love to cook. Hosting a dinner party makes me so happy, and Aaron and I have had some winners. However, I cannot cook when I am angry. My food tastes bad. On the flip side, when I am in a good mood, my food tastes better.
So a boring little update but more poetry, some excerpts and ponderings are to come again on a regular basis.
Flames of light put out like candles, trailing into smoke.
But what of the infirm oldsters who had no family to take them in or support them, and no savings to live on for the rest of their lives? The workhouse, the poorhouse, or perhaps dying in a gutter in some cases.
Her unusual hat is stuffed with fiberfil and topped with a gold-toned button.
As I started writing a reply to her, I realized it was going to be more than a short response! So without further adieu, here are my thoughts on pre-run fuel at this stage in my training.
(Covers included)
Editing
Video game developers have already released several games in which users can reenact bin Laden’s last stand, and in one version, players can choose whether to defend bin Laden or play as the Navy SEALs who carried out the raid (AFP, Kokatu, Toronto Star, NYDN, Wired). One of the games has already been downloaded at least 9,000 times (BBC).
On our third fish/seafood for the week, we finally picked up some red snapper. We have avoided this fish because we just did not know what to do with it. But we were lucky as we found a recipe in our file dating back to 1997 from Two Hot Tamales.
Friday was another cool, damp, spring day. I didn't have to take my parents to any appointments and so I took a ride to the Crop Shop in Rockland. I hadn't been their since the first of the year. I bought some papers, a 6 x 6 paper stack that had lovely papers. I also picked up a spray bottle of Goosebumps texture spray. I wasn't even sure what to do with this product, and I certainly need to experiment some more with it. Right now, I'm not sure what I think of this product. Read about it here...Goosebumps texture spray
Insta-boom!!
My only visual was the little red dots on the screen -
I told her I didn’t need her. My father was coming Wednesday morning, then Chuck’s mother.
No, it bloody well isn't. Quite a few brands have been built without them: walk round any supermarket or department store and you'll see some. In fact there is a fair bit of evidence to suggest that unprofessional videos are more convincing and may do more for you.
Drive, very simple. The main goal of this day is to get to the park at some reasonable time. Grand Canyon, as well as other wild places in its immediate area in Arizona, Utah, and Nevada, is located in this weird no man’s land where driving was already too long, but flying was a bit too short. Since in this trip I was also planning to visit LA, driving was a good option.
Dieter (Indian in the machine)
Dear Writer,
A few years ago I was at a liturgy in a small, unfamiliar parish in another part of the state. As usual, I did my best not to sing so loudly that I stuck out from the rest of the congregation, but I still sang as clearly as I usually do. Processing to communion we were singing You Are Mine (to which, of course, I know all the words), and the young man in front of me, a few steps from the communion station, turned around and whispered “Nice job!”
I want to plunge my hands in clear water. The way
Damp grass shines and puddles glisten like chrome,
Every boy will love this book. Jamie Carpenter is an average teenager with a very unusual family history. After witnessing the brutal murder of his father and then kidnapping of his mother, Jamie ends up in the secret government organisation Department 19. He soon discovers his father’s and grandfather’s links to this secret organisation, which was originally established by Van Helsing to fight supernatural forces in the aftermath of his battle with Dracula.
Convinced that her true mother, Tiny Doom — long believed to have been killed by the evil Birdies — is alive, Flora becomes determined to find her. Doing so will allow Flora to leave behind the lies her false mother, Buck Fyrdraaca, has told her about who she is. She can shake off the slavish drudgery of being a lowly lieutenant in the Army of Califa. And she need never again speak to her former best friend (and recent love) Udo — he's become a total snapperhead. Instead, Flora and her red dog, Flynn, are thrown into a journey that takes them to the high seas, onto lawless islands, and into the deadly desert. It's an adventure filled with pirate battles, magickal encounters, and an unexpected romance with a brooding stranger who reveals himself to be a kindred spirit. And it all becomes far more dangerous when Flora realizes how desperately the Birdies want Tiny Doom — and Flora herself — dead.
On a more personal note. I went to the grocer yesterday. The dog was out of milk and I was out of bread.
Peg, unconditionally loving, not too bright, but a wonderful mother who sees the best in people, even when there is almost nothing there to see.
Time to get back up into the saddle!
Lisa and James- We wish you a lifetime of smiles and happiness (no doubt you will have just that!)
It's the first time I have ever spoken to someone who is the recipient of an egg donor. She's the only one I know of. The best thing of all is that she is SO lovely. Easy to talk to with a tender heart, she is just wonderful. And she loves Jesus which is the best thing of all.
What gave the Apostle Paul a burden to know the Lord Jesus Christ even more, especially after having completed his three apostolic journeys? We are looking at Philippians 3:10, writing this from his prison in Rome.
songs and in the desire I felt
The firm is hoping to sell almost 40-50 cars by the year 2015. Lamborghini is also planning to start its national sales office in the country soon which displays the firm’s strong commitment to the market.
You’ll probably find me down there before any kisses have been exchanged. Call me nasty, call me a bowcat, call me a carpet muncher… in fact call me dem tings… if that’s what people need to feel comfortable about themselves and what they do between the sheets then go right ahead.
Sting defeated Flair with a Scorpion Deathlock. Hogan and Immortal came out to try to distract Stinger, while Hogan gave Flair some brass knuckles, but it didn’t work because of a slow count, and Sting received his second wind. Mr. Anderson came out to help Sting and send Immortal back. Abyss was the only one not involved, and he walked back.
Step 1. Mix your dry ingredients together (except for the yeast) and then add in the yeast once it has finished proofing with the wet ingredients. Mix by hand about 30 times until the dough looks like the picture on the right. Add more water until it becomes a thick pancake batter (add a bit more water because rye soaks up a lot)
So this is the man in charge of Scientology? Someone with little formal training, little real auditing experience, no C/Sing experience? And someone who refuses standard auditing and training?
“Thou art the LORD the God, who didst choose Abram, and broughtest him forth out of Ur of the Chaldees, and gavest him the name of Abraham;” – (Nehemiah 9:7)
14-Reconsider Baby
Alcohol by volume: 5.8%
Glittering Images, Susan Howatch (authenticity)
Ganymede and Callisto are also very likely to have ice and possibly water. What we know is that Europa, Ganymede and Callisto have a rocky core surrounded by ice. There could be oceans of water, if not canals, just underneath their frozen surface. The mission planed by ESA will be about investigating those satellites and their physical and geological properties and their potential to be habitats for life. The probe which will be, well, probing those satellites will be housed in the Ariane 5 rocket that will be launched in 2022. It will take about 7.5 years for the probe to reach Jupiter and will spend another 3.5 years investigating those 3 satellites. 7.5 years is a long time, in human terms, but let’s not forget how vast the distances are between us and the satellites.
I was praying about this when I drove by these mountains. Storm clouds, caught by high winds changed the look of the range every few minutes. By the time I found a place to stop my car, they shifted again. The view reminded me that every time I think I have some aspect God figured out he obscures the familiar and comfortable and shows me another side of his character.
I am hoping... That this wonderful weather continues all week. I love these sunny and warm days. England does not see too many it has to be said!
Screw you Ian.”
Proverbs 1:7 The fear of the LORD is the beginning of knowledge Ways of the foolish Fools despise wisdom and instruction.
Saute the mushrooms and onion in the butter for 10 minutes. Sprinkle over some salt just to help them release the water. Once the onions are very translucent and the mushrooms have shrunk into tiny pieces, add in the flour. Cook for another 2 minutes then start adding in the milk.
You end up bogged done with the day-to-day activities, the back-end administrative type work you come to dislike. The type of activities that keep you working in the assignment but not working the assignment; there is a difference.
When Captain America was young, his family would always gather to play Uno during a power outage. Most often, during a Tornado warning. He had fond memories of it, so he thought it could be a fun tradition in our house too. We brought a tray of candles into the living room to the coffee table, and all huddled around it.
Nov 5 – Club 101 – El Paso, TX (W/Cobra Starship)
I Could sleep for a day,
The letter went on and on but all I could do was read the first line over and over again. So this is it ... the time has come.
He wasn’t there again
I’m of the opinion that between Siréne and Sigma, pretty soon there will be no need to hold onto the majority of older Floyd releases considering the high ratio of upgrades/definitive versions to duds (which can literally be counted on one hand) and Creative Intelligence is no exception, if naught else for the logical distribution of the set over 3 discs, and it sounds fantastic for an audience source, so don’t hesitate on this one or you’ll regret it later!
Welcome to 2011, where the Austin supermarket bargain bounty continues unabated.
This is the table at which I usually work. As you can see it is somewhat otherwise occupied. It's a nice spot, though. A big window with lots of light streaming in, a daylight lamp, some convenient shelves right at my elbow...too bad I can't even get to it! (Let alone work at it.) The little workspace you see in the picture at the top of the post is the tiny bit of space I get at the computer desk if I push the keyboard as far back as I can. It's so small a space that I can only put an 8-1/2 x 11 piece of paper on its side and even then one of the corners hangs off the edge a bit.
While you moved and marched at your own special pace,
Really it does.
If any man is discovering they’re dealing with a headache, they may have relations and feel loads better – why because apparently sex is a option to stop pain from somewhere as nicely as stopping someone from feeling depressed. Many people as we speak imagine that the guts goes to be made healthier with somebody who has an excellent lively intercourse life, as nicely as making a relationship stronger.
You deserve this, you have paid all your dues
But now I want it to look just like this with the smoke and all.....oh well that probably wouldn't be safe. Don't the spiders give it a great creepy touch......I truly hate spiders,but they are a great Halloween decor item. But we arachnophobia people don't even like the plastic pretend kind either!
Collectively, the polarities are also being balanced. The feminine energy that is love, receptivity and compassion is rising to balance the masculine imbalance that has occurred. A sensitivity toward the earth, and an emerging planetary awareness is being activated as a result. The mis-perception of us as separate from nature and from the oneness of reality is the veil that is beginning to drop. As our understanding transforms to accept the true nature of the universe, in all its multi-dimensionality, we will begin to experience a new world based on a new understanding.
Here is a link to aluminum containing products. Get them out quickly as well as other household toxins like detergents and dryer sheets, baby powder, bleach, pasteurized milk, deodorant, unnatural perfumes, and fluorescent lights which contain mercury powder.
Porn. Slash. Don’t be so suburban. It’s all entertainment, right?
For the record, I am not in favor of showing a lot of skin away from the beach, as I perceive it as disrespectful to self regardless of one’s sex. Yet irrespective of how a woman dresses, she does not deserve ribald comments, much less assaultive behavior. This is what SlutWalks point out – that it’s the person who commits assault who is at fault, not the victim. Would we blame a forty-something, male executive for wearing his Rolex and thus bringing down upon himself an assault and theft?
My one word of caution would be to look for signs of new growth on any clearance items you buy, so you can be sure that it will actually produce for you come spring. Since most perennials should be starting to put out new growth right now (especially if they're living in a greenhouse), it's the perfect time to go looking. What better way to spend a wintery weekend?
He was standing under the pear tree snapping a twig.
The group pointed out in its most recent newsletter that 1988 is the same year the U.S. Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices began recommending a second dose of the MMR vaccine, which included cells derived from the tissue of aborted babies.
Do you do Christmas lights at your house? I've never really been into decorating our place with lights out the front. Mainly because it's a big enough job to get the Christmas tree and lights up inside the house, let alone have time for the outside. I do like the idea of it, but it would also mean hubby would have to set it all up and I don't like the idea of the extra electricity expense either! There are a few houses around us that like to get into the Christmas spirit with lights on their houses. Maybe one day we will join in.
In my 'community', within my friends, in my family life and even strangers who believe the lies all of the above say about me.
The Peruvian Maritime Institute (Imarpe) said so far 538 dead pelicans and 54 boobies had been found in various stages of decomposition, although most appeared to have died recently.
Stood in the sun lonely and bare
I think everyone in the room yesterday would agree that Jeff Masson did a pretty thorough job of weighing the sources against one another; what's more, he was prepared to suspend judgement where insufficient data was available. It was a rivetting perfomance. A shame a few more of you weren't there. I really am sorry that I didn't have the foresight to warn you in advance that he was coming to Albany.
"The Bad Boys of Saloons" happens from 3:00 pm to 4:30 pm July 21 in the Queen Anne Ballroom at the Hotel Monteleone. Go here to purchase tickets.
“Okay. Where are you now?”
as that was the name on bottom of image.
‘‘(5) CYBERSECURITY PURPOSE.—The term ‘cybersecurity purpose’ means the purpose of ensuring the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of, or safeguarding, a system or network, including protecting a system or network from—
Simulacrum Skill Points
Mitt Romney thanked all of his vanquished GOP opponents by name at a Republican National Committee unity lunch here Friday.
dean-ferber@sbcglobal.net
I stop the stroller. My nice voice disappears and I crouch down next to Allison and tell her to stop crying. I tell her that crying is a perfectly ok thing to do, but that she is not allowed to cry because she is disappointed about a park. I tell her that when she feels a certain way about something she has to use her words and her “nice voice” to explain what she is feeling, that a breakdown is not an acceptable way of dealing with what she feels.
What does it look like? Is your face relaxed and are your eyes calm and serene? Perhaps there’s even a twinkle in those eyes that suggests a wicked sense of humour. Your skin glows with great health and your body, no matter whatever shape or colour or size, is perfect as it is. You can feel that and nobody can take that sense of perfection away from you.
Because I am a whore for Sleep! And Southern Lord in general! I even bought a freaking Sleep shirt for my wife, who doesn't even like metal! And she wears it! And gets compliments on it! And then says, "It's his."
I've just opened a new drawing book......
It doesn’t take a rocket surgeon to figure out why liberals engage in such hyperbole and condescension. Ninety percent of black voters choose Democrats, and if portraying them as eternally oppressed victims of racism and bias gets them to the polls, so be it.
The BMA, GMC, RCN, RCGP, all these organisations give backing to a system which causes harm and distress to some of the most vulnerable members of society, both physically and mentally disabled people are being found “Fit to Work” by a process that shows no empathy or dignity to the people undergoing this process, why did people going into the medical profession go into the profession in the first place, if not to alleviate suffering and distress?
I feel regret and consider canceling the whole process, but it’s all ready ¾ of the way through.
I lied. I actually watched the video. By "watched" I mean I clicked onto the links a hundred people posted to me, and I let the video run for about 2 whole mins. I couldn't continue watching it. I simply, simply couldn't. The video was too up-its-own-arse and almost made me vomit. And as it is I already didn't like the campaign due to the spam.
So, in the end there can be a lot said for it, even though it is best to choose just what those words are very carefully if you suspect she is somewhere within earshot and has easy access to something sharp and pointy.
No matter what, August and September will be right around the corner. For that matter, so is mid-June...my first opportunity to move back to the states.
When you register with your state as a sole proprietorship or whatever, then you'll be responsible for paying sales tax (depending on your state I guess). Now I collect sales tax online only for Virginia (because that's where my business physically resides) and I incorporated it into my prices for in-person sales such as home parties or fairs in Virginia (didn't want to deal with the change!) Since I'm new, I have to file & pay monthly (which I can do online). After a while, they'll let me do it quarterly. Now that I have a "Sales & Use Tax" certificate, I'm able to buy from wholesalers too--pretty cool.
Next was off to the reception, where I went straight for the buffet table because I hadn't eaten all day. The place was packed and the line barely moving, and unfortunately prevented me from talking to Archbishop Dolan again. By the time I spotted him, he was already leaving. He gave a general wave in my direction and then a cop escorted him out the door.
Copy editors writing headlines for the Web should go beyond writing the clear, catchy headlines that appear in print editions. Online headlines should be noun-heavy so that when the average reader is searching for information, such as “Obama puppy,” on a search engine like Google, they are directed to the newspaper’s Web site.
Thanks for stopping by...have a great day!
Still, every time I hear wood pigeons I remember those holidays, and have flashbacks to those happy times. The human mind is a funny thing! I also remember how my dad would get up after the pigeons woke him, and he would walk down to the campsite shop and fetch the daily newspaper. Then he would sit outside the caravan in his deckchair with a mug of tea and his paper, and he was happy for an hour or two. Meanwhile my mum would be preparing breakfast or packing up a picnic. Poor Mum, we never did appreciate all she did on those holidays. Sorry Mum!
Arturo Lupoli was the best finisher I’d ever seen at his age, and so intelligent for a player so young. I had it his career mapped out in my head – allowing for injuries and adjustments he’d be getting 25 goals a season come 2008, no problem. I tell you, back in 2005 the future was so bright I got a tan off my crystal ball.
Tell-tale signs of FATIGUE connected with RA are a frequent state of weariness and tiredness, or “unrelenting exhaustion”(1), per the Mayo Clinic. According to the Johns Hopkins Arthritis Center, “FATIGUE is common in all patients with an inflammatory arthritis such as psoriatic arthritis and rheumatoid arthritis. It is likely multifactorial. Medications, lack of mobility and exercise, sleep disturbance, chronic systemic inflammation and in some cases depression can all play a role.”(2)
17. Writing blueprint=”Idea. Collect. Focus. Draft. Clarify.”
Maybe they assumed that everyone would vote for retired Majors or Miss Marple figures?
1. Heat the olive oil in a large soup pot and add the onions. Saute for a few minutes until it starts to become translucent.
Iridology readings are typically performed by such holistically oriented practitioners as naturopaths, chiropractors, or nutritionists. The reading may be done using a bright light, a magnifying glass, and a notepad. The iridologist may also use various tools to better view the eye, a special camera to take pictures of the iris, and/or a computer.
Stopped by Tractor Supply and got all they had. I figured to fill that hole it was going to take a lot. I packed it in. A lot of it fell out because of the wound and it's position. I am sure the fact I cheated and warmed that salve in hot water until it was thick syrup didn't help it stay in place. Lesson learned. Amazon does carry it, but it is almost twice the price of other places both on line and local.
a match made in heaven, darlings!
BLAME
That’s the carefree-careless-damn it attitude of many a woman today who is successful in life, independent and able to lead her life without the support (emotional and financial) of a man. Why! Women can even get pregnant and bring up a child without the aid of a man today. Technology has advanced so much. It is a different fact that many women still stay caught in a time capsule where they continue to get exploited. There’s no denying that.
Choose the one job or the other,
When a new relationship shows up in your life, which of your fears surface? Do you seek to understand where these fears stem from, or do you repress them hoping they’ll go away?
24. Helen Suzman, stateswoman (1917–2009)
Secondly, once I realized that I was really suffering, I started to keep my eyes out for race volunteers or medical volunteers. The water stations were obviously manned by volunteers, so if I had really wanted to stop, I could have made it to a water station, but they were about 1.5 miles apart. I specifically did not see any medical volunteers at all, and no other volunteers in between water stations. This concerned me during the race a lot. I know that NYRR races have multitudes of volunteers, and I have volunteered a couple of times, but I never really realized how important and beneficial that was until I didn’t have it. Of course, it could be that there were lots of volunteers, and I didn’t see them, but again, this is a concern. If someone is injured or unwell during a race, there is a good chance they will be panicking and not able to identify help quickly. Volunteers need to be loud and visible.
Admittedly, i have been playing with you here. Yes, being mad is a state of mind and that state should actually be encouraged in another way. You see, being M.A.D. as the way i define it, is to always be Manifesting (an) Abundant Destiny.
As goes the do-do bird, so do the gold watches. Today’s business is dominated by desire for mobile devices and iPads are the hot ticket. Building on the knowledge that business is being done on the go Avalla has made some changes for it’s latest Leader challenge.
This is more than a poem.
I find the whole "I was just another pretty face" outcry, ridiculous. I think it's just another limb on the tree of vanity. Because if you're not getting enough attention being pretty and you feel like you need to complain about being pretty? Then you really are a sad, sad case.
It was all a prosecutorial fantasy; none of it was true. Yet Anderson pounded his fists into his hands and wept to the jury as he described Morton’s perversity. Compared with this vivid picture of the crime, Morton’s defense didn’t have a lot to offer.
Yoochun sigh.
God, I miss my dad. Sometimes, I have nightmares that he is alive and the only reason I don't see him is because we lost touch with each other. In my nightmare, my dad is living his life somewhere but I have no idea where. I feel so alone after these dreams and I grieve for him all over again.
I think I've had too much caffeine.
Dye ink: Wild honey-Ranger
But of course, the sense that I had not done enough with myself, had not accomplished a number of specific tasks, was real. There are certainly a lot of things I want to do, and one of the gifts that has come from the cancer experience is that I've learned what things are and are not important to me.
He added: “I’m absolutely mortified. I’ve never had so much as a point on my licence since 1978. It’s humiliating and embarrassing.”
First Position is an Upcoming movie documentary that follows six young dancers from around the world as they prepare for the Youth America Grand Prix, one of the most prestigious ballet competition’s in the world.For the young dancers at the Youth America Grand Prix, one of the world’s most prestigious ballet competitions, lifelong dreams are at stake. With hundreds competing for a handful of elite scholarships and contracts.
The Bad: They just love to grow into massive bushes in any type of roadside or disturbed soil. Easily shading or crowding out any native plants
Now, while I dip into poetry now and then, I can't say I have a favourite poet - ancient or modern! Following ideas from my blogfriends in relation to pasta free lasagne, now I am asking for suggestions on poets. Which contemporary poets are worth further attention? I have 3 weeks before this task is due, so there's no mad rush, but as this area is unfamiliar to me I'd like to start reading around soon. If anyone can throw in some names as a starting point I'd be eternally grateful. It's good to have the challenge of learning about something new. That's always one of the exciting things about autumn isn't it.
Back to the draft. To me, there are two hard and fast rules of the draft.
The length and width of the gusset is something I always just guess at. Basically, you want it to be as big as it needs to be to get the job done, but not much bigger than that, because the larger it is, the more it might show. Sometimes, I'll simply go ahead and attach the sleeve before a fitting but leave about 6" under the armpit unattached, and then I'll decide in the fitting how long and how wide I want the gusset to be.
There’s the rub in the psychological metaphor, isn’t it. Once the tipping point is reached and repression no longer avails, you’re drenched. There’s both relief and deluge, life-giving spiritual water as truth precipitates, and the attendant difficulty of taking it in. Add daybreak into the picture, and you’ve got to look at whatever the light reveals, a situation faced by anyone who is waking up from any kind of sleep: addiction, self-protective hibernation, the chrysalis of youth, dissociation as an anesthetic for trauma.
But that shouldn't be such a big deal for anyone, because in most real-life situations, it is all right if you don't know all the answers, or even any of the answers. I would even say that you can hope for better results if you can quickly admit that you do not know the answer to a specific question, or the best solution to a problem. Because the best things to know are when you need help and where to go for help. And then you go there. And you ask for help. You are not alone and you don't have to figure things out on your own. Unless you are in school taking a test. Then you're on your own, sorry. You shouldn't even be reading this.
(The woman massages Tilda with exotic oils and scrubs.)
Around 7 or 8pm the night before, I boiled 2 mugs of water in the microwave. I put 3 teabags of chai tea in one, and 2 teabags of chamomile in the other. I was using the rest of the chai, & wasn’t sure if one mug would be enough water, so I brewed the chamomile to have on hand just in case. The chamomile was years old.
Records – North Salem 0-8; Mahopac 1-5.
There are about 1,500 naturopathic physicians in the United States practicing as of 2004; nearly 80% of these practitioners entered the profession following the revival of interest in naturopathy in the late 1970s.
“No Way Down” takes us inside an ill-fated exhibition to conquer K2. The book is a thrilling and spine-chilling account of what happened when a collection of teams tried to conquer the second tallest mountain in the world. What made the account especially poignant for me was remembering the press coverage at the time about Gerard McDonnell, the first Irishman to climb to the top of K2. In this book he is presented as an Irishman to be proud of, with great humour and generosity and the ability to get on with people from all backgrounds.
- Design: although it's a bit ugly and simple it's functional. I'm not really sure how I want it to look in the future. Perhaps some tabs or crap like that. I'll need to plan this out so there will not be any changes soon.
The same goes for new ideas – they never stop coming, and that’s awesome, and you should never throw anything away. Jot it down, yes – and then put it aside. You can work on it one day, or maybe not. Ideas, ultimately, aren’t worth that much – and they’re worth nothing if they pull you off focus. Sure, it’d be great to make a game about Napoleonics but if you keep that in the back of your mind while you’re browsing the library or the internet, you suddenly have twice as many links to look at – those and the ones about your current project on Killer Robots. It’s great to be interested in everything, and it’s great to feed the great crowds of piranha in your mind on the endless bounty of the river of knowledge that pours off the information superhighway - but at the same time, you’ve doubled your internet search load – and halved your writing time on both games.
2105 Report of a male lying on the ground near to the Lodges on Beeston Lane. Security attended on arrival the male was sitting up. He stated that he was a member of staff but had felt a bit “wonky” after attending a formal event at a Hall of Residence. Security took the male home as he was still unsteady on his feet.
"When You Were a Child" – (3:02)
There is little doubt that my proposal would increase software quality and computer security in the long run, which is exactly what the current situation calls for.
(e) Any form of propaganda designed to promote or incite racial or ethnic discrimination directed against them.
Alphabetise by author, obviously. But all my books are divided into fiction, non-fiction, poetry, plays, English Literature (i.e. my annotated texts from school), travel, photography, history, biography, and reference. What? I used to be a librarian, sue me.
to acknowledge our disdain for responsibility.
the current issue of the cashmere & bridal genius (j.crew) has been
DP's from MME, paper flowers from Prima, cardstock, dies, twine and buttons from PTI, paper heart from Martha Stewart and misc. ricrac.
Originally, Girl Crazy was to end with a reprise of "Embraceable You", Mickey and Judy surrounded by the rest of the cast as the orchestra swells up and out. But Busby Berkeley's flamboyant staging of "I Got Rhythm", scheduled to come almost 20 minutes before the end, threatened to turn anything that followed into a dribbling anticlimax. There was some hurried reshuffling of the script and music, and Girl Crazy as it was released on November 26 ended with "I Got Rhythm". It must have positively galled Roger Edens; he'd gotten his way and had Berkeley canned from the picture, and now here was Berkeley literally getting the last word -- cracking whips, firing guns and all. But it was the right call, and, however grudgingly, he probably had to admit it.
Hello all.
releasing wispy fumes of flashbacks and phantasm woes,
Jeff knew the whole story before they were married. They both thought that the reviews would stop when she turned twenty one. But they only got more complicated once she became a full fledged adult and worse still after she had the children. What a way to have an anniversary. She wanted to go to the cemetery with flowers for the families graves on this twenty-fifth year since their deaths. There was no one else to remember who they were. Only Jenny was left.
1. Went to sleep at 4 am or something, Saturday morning. Little hard to remember as I was not awake. 2. Got up again at some point. 3. Checked Twitter, Tumblr & email. 4. Checked the cam site MFC. 5. Listened to music. 6. Didn’t have breakfast but started eating chocolate. 7. Must have watched pictures and/or videos because I seem to remember having masturbated at some point during the day. 8. Started to feel ill or sick in the early afternoon. 9. Went to have a nap while getting dinner ready or after or before, not really sure. 10. Slept a bit after dinner too. Felt better. 11. Got back to reading tweets and listening to music. 12. Was at MFC for a bit looking around. 18. Checked Tumblr and re-blogged a lot of stuff. 19. Fell asleep sitting at computer. 20. Woke up and was awake a while. 21 Decided to sleep in bed and went to bed. Got up again around midnight and checked the usual stuff. 22. Felt sleepy around 3 am and went back to sleep. 23. Woke up again at 8 am. Got up. 24. Checked Twitter. Checked Tumblr and checked MFC. 25. Listened to music through Spotify and decided to write a blog post. 26. Started writing but stopped after a few sentences to watch a video. 27. Daydreamed a while. 28. Watched video again while beginning to masturbate. 29. Interrupted by uncle coming to visit. 30. Helped uncle to check the car to prepare for inspection tomorrow morning. 31. Back at computer. Checked Twitter & Tumblr. 32. Decided to write this blog post. 33. Wrote this blog post. 34. Published this blog post. 35. Will masturbate again since I didn’t get to finish before. 36. Later I will try to have a quick shower and wash my hair even though the water is not really warm enough. Must have that fixed very soon. 37. Rest of evening don’t know what I’ll do but probably much of the same as the other evening. 38. Go to sleep at a decent hour.
The most important tip I can give you is… Self Motivation is going to be your best friend.
Queen Bee Doll
So to work, to work!
Rome was an unloved, un-mourned mistress by the man-in-the-street after her fall. Wait till we get to the Reconquest of Italy (circa mid 500′s) under Justinian (emperor in the East) – how the populace LAMENTED the incredible arrogance, ruthlessness, and efficiency of the imperial tax collectors after nearly a century of peace under the German Ostrogoths. The new Imperials RUINED Italy.
those of temporal
There will be a This Is Oregon photo show and party at The Ace Hotel in Portland on May 3rd, admission is free and so is the beer! ( If only we were closer, we would be there for sure! ) Super cool prints of Julian’s This Is Oregon work can be purchased here. I can’t decide which one I love best. Each one is more beautiful than the next, just like the landscape in Oregon. ( I’m leaning toward the Columbia River Gorge piece above– it’s one of our favorite OR places! )
Now, where will I be able to hang them so they don't drip all over my floor? A final look at the skeins in the next post.
Preheat oven to 350°F. Grease a 1 1/2 quart baking dish and set aside.
3. Joseph Beattie (2007) – His performance was pretty solid and convincing. However, there were a few moments when his Henry felt more like a stalker than a seducer. But in the end, he gave a pretty good performance.
I try not to allow myself to feel the crushing sense of guilt at the inevitable extra strain and burden it places on those I love the most.
Pappy spoke up again, “Can either of you fellas fly one of them whirlybirds?”
Hearing how the universally obeyed Viṣṇu became a driver, ally, assistant, friend, messenger, guard, follower, and respecter of the beloved Pāṇḍavas caused the king to become moved with devotion for Viṣṇu’s lotus-like feet .
Benjamin Cook: Lovely lady. Met her many times over the years. She was always so kind. Heartfelt condolences to Brian & Sadie. Such sad news.
Somewhere between lunch and recess
Please feel free to contact her for any guidance. Discover good health.you can leave comments which I will forward to her but direct communication is better. Do pass the blog link to all friends if you believe in Energy Healing and get benefited.
Building work on the blocks started in December last year and is expected to be completed this summer.
Penguin
But as usual I need some reassurance, because there are two sets I like and cant decide?
**A HUGE bonus to this recipe is that you can prepare it the night before. I prepare it in the baking pan and refrigerate it. Then, come morning, I just have to bake it!
Prices of each ink bottle (60cc) ---1260JPY
Quiet time.
In one episode, her roommate, a non-student council member, clearly indicated that she knew about Shirley and Lelouch when she asked about him when Shirley wrote the letter. Their relation should be something a lot of people know. So are you saying that no one, not a single person talk to Shirley about Lelouch? If that happen, won’t that result in, I don’t know, fuck things up since that will mess up Shirley’s mind and Shirley will totally bother Lelouch about it even if she didn’t know he is Zero?
I'm going to buy it.
at putting a few pictures along with the tune.
If you wish to renew your property without spending a fortune or spending a lot of time to produce satisfying results, then your best option is to go with color.
On our way home, I caught a salamander for the kids. I was actually getting worried that I wasn't going to be able to catch one for them. It was Saturday and we'd been there since Wednesday, and I'd blown the only chance I'd gotten thus far by not being quick enough. But this time, I caught one. :) I'm not sure who was more excited, me or the kids!
Update 11-9-11:
We need no intellectual reasons or underpinnings to justify our allegiance to or emotional bonding with our own kind any more than we have to justify favouring our children over someone else’s. Parents who want other people’s children to do better than their own are perverse and unnatural.
1/4 teaspoon sugar
Graduate programs should use 3.0 as a minimum. Obviously, schools want to promulgate the view (sometimes an illusion) that their graduate students are a step up from undergraduates. At the same time, they want to promote the belief that graduate education is more rigorous and serious than its undergraduate counterpart. Sometimes these hypotheses are accurate and sometimes they are no more than myths. For instance, I can point to numerous instances in which a school's undergraduates are more intellectually capable than their graduate peers.
similar with mother-of-pearl snaps and some wide
My back is every day a little bit better, thank you for the lovely emails I've received.
You see, ideas are round – the earth is flat
… Well, we’ve actually got 10, but they’ll only take a few minutes to answer if you can spare some time.
“Jimmy, we’re not gonna STORE the motherf***er…..!”
So, how does quilting fit into this challenge? Both Katie and I love to improvise, so this is an IMPROV challenge too. For every mile you log, you get one piece of fabric. My weekly goal is 15 miles. So, if I achieve my goal, at the end of the week, I get 15 pieces of fabric that I can sew together in some improvisational way. You can use scraps, or you can cut new fabric. You can add a piece one mile at a time or you can collect them on your design wall and then sew them together at the end. If you want to make a potholder from your first 15 pieces, go for it. It's up to you. Improvise!! We're going to try to keep the challenge going for at least 6 months...let's see... 4 weeks a month, 15 miles each week x 6 months...that's 360 pieces of fabric. Imagine what I or you could make from that!
Okay the weird little thing is that I did this layout in January! But it totally looks like the sketch right? I did it BEFORE I saw this sketch. Don't believe me, well look at a few posts below! I think that we are on the same wavelength! Weird! I used some scrap papers and made my own sprays using Faber -Castell's Gelatos and water. I also used the Pitt Artist pens. Anyways... I thought I'd link it here with the sketch to compare and show off my ESP abilities. I'm working on another layout using the sketch as inspiration so I'll post that when I finish as my OFFICIAL take on this sketch. I just couldn't help comparing the sketch to this previously created page. I don't know about you but these cold, snowy, blah days are getting to me! I wish I was somewhere warm. My parents keep tormenting me with photos of West Palm Beach and Key West! They are having a great time and won't be back until the beginning of April. I'm jealous and sitting here wishing that I had a warm location to jet off to. It's mid-winter break and I have the winter blues!
The Jamaican Black Strap is not a scary drink. You may or may not believe me depending on your view of the two primary ingredients: molasses and Jamaican rum. I happen to love Jamaican rum. This fact alone would have floored Mr. Baker, who many times asserts that most ladies have a strong dislike for the stronger, more pungent Jamaican rums. I do not particularly disagree with his assertion--indeed, some women probably would find the funkier rums a bit too, um, well, funky for their liking. I would add, however, that, as with most things, this fact does not apply to women alone. Leaving bold statements about gender stereotyping aside, why is Jamaican rum so challenging? The easy answer: it comes down to production.
at the round table, what matters are- your heart, your intentions, your sincerity, your concrete actions and your plans.
So, are you there yet?
The ruling class of any nation, for example, consists of a loose alliance of power centers, held together by the pressures of mutual advantage, but constantly pursuing their own divergent interests and eagerly trying to claim a larger share of power and wealth at the expense of the other power centers. There are always families, factions, and social groups rising up into the ruling class at any given point, and others falling out of it; while outside the ruling class is an even more complex constellation of groups who support power centers within the ruling class, who expect to receive wealth and privileges in return for their support, and who rise and fall in their own intricate rhythm. Proceed step by step down the pyramid, and you’ll find the same complexities in place all the way down to the bottom, where a flurry of ethnic, cultural, and social groups compete with one another over whose oppression ought to get the most attention from middle class liberals.
Now when I tell Uni “I love you,” I believe all four of these are in action. Though she is my closest friend, though I have a close family affection for her, and though (I believe) I desire the greatest good for her, I still desire her. It’s not an either/or.
It is common for anyone in a busy lifestyle to let friendships slip. But when you are faced with your approaching death, the physical details of life fall away. People do want to get their financial affairs in order if possible. But it is not money or status that holds the true importance for them. They want to get things in order more for the benefit of those they love. Usually though, they are too ill and weary to ever manage this task. It is all comes down to love and relationships in the end. That is all that remains in the final weeks, love and relationships.
Firstly, why haven't I seen all of them? Well, it was a combination of broke and lazy which I like to call "brazy". The last one I saw in theatres was number 2. And what a number 2 it was. Boring, slow, and only ONE member of NKOTB. Then the rest of them rolled out over the next several Halloweens. And I couldn't really be bothered. But they kept coming and the people who loved it seemed to really love it and after doing some quick wiki searches, it seems like the makers actually tried to make an attempt to infuse the films with purpose, mystery and mythology. Maybe it wasn't always successful but hey, I haven't done any better.
To learn more about Office Solutions Plus LLC and the services we provide, make sure to visit our website!
to the warm kitchen.
What about the Haitians who come here? There are approximately two million Haitians living abroad, mainly in the U.S. and Canada. Since more than eight percent of Haitians are estimated to have the HIV virus, this represents a considerable health risk, but Haitians bring other things with them. In 1998, a Haitian woman on Long Island was almost burned to death in a ceremony by her voodoo priest. He was apparently trying to remove evil spirits from her house when he doused her with a flammable liquid and set her on fire. When authorities charged him with attempted murder local Haitians rallied to his defense. “Like a lot of ethnic groups who’ve migrated here, we’ve brought our culture with us,” explained a community leader.
without my children’s love
Son: Why would it have a stick?
Gedeon Richter plc v Bayer Schering Pharma AG [2011] EWHC 583 (Pat), 17 March 2011, is a recent decisoin of Mr Justice Floyd in the Patents Court for England and Wales. A keenly-fought contest which required six days of hearings, it resulted in a 186-paragraph judgment in which Richter, a Hungarian company, sought revocation of two Bayer contraceptive patents which are currently in the midst of opposition proceedings before the European Patent Office. In the result, Floyd J held some of Bayer's claims were invalid for obviousness but not for added subject matter.
1/2 vanilla pod or 1 teaspoon of vanilla paste.
This used to be a beautiful, verdant park... sigh.
The main reason we'd come over to Norway was to celebrate Tilda's first birthday. That's my granddaughter and Paul's niece. Her birthday was on Sunday so we had to take the early flight out of Liverpool to Oslo then go straight to my ex-husband's house where the party was being held. It was a lovely day so most of the party gathered outside on the terrace to enjoy traditional hotdogs followed by a selection of home-made cakes.
4. Go to our Christmas in the Valley event invite on facebook, and RSVP and click "select guests to invite". Invite at least 30 people for THREE EXTRA ENTRIES. Be sure to leave 3 separate comments saying you did this, so you'll be counted.
The only good woman is dead.
Vacuum/Dust upstairs
The dum dum did this twice becoming something of lore.
Location: Main Street USA
and left a crying goalie
I want to say my deepest regret for not having be able to post daily Oracle or Tarot readings for the last couple of days, due to the fact that I was hospitalized.
I had some left over corn tortillas that needed to be used, so what better way to use them up than to make some chips? I decided to make some cinnamon chips for the boys to snack on today. Let me just say....yum!
In the March issue of ArtReview, I invite you to read my piece on Raymond Pettibon's last show at Regen Projects. This is a link to the article online. Thanks for reading.
Scripture of the Day: “Therefore if you have any encouragement from being united with Christ, if any comfort from his love, if any common sharing in the Spirit, if any tenderness and compassion, 2 then make my joy complete by being like-minded, having the same love, being one in spirit and of one mind. 3 Do nothing out of selfish ambition or vain conceit. Rather, in humility value others above yourselves,” - Philippians 2:1-3.
I hate why I need
Vitaly Petrov: “After a good test in Mugello we are all looking forward to getting back to racing in Spain. Barcelona is a track I know well and one I like racing on. I was on the podium there in GP2 in 2009 and while I know that’s out of reach for us at the moment, we will all be focusing on continuing to take the fight to the cars ahead and repeating the sort of performances we’ve put in so far this season, particularly on Sundays.”
Put off Radio 3 now which has induced raptures in me in order to watch for the umpteenth time “Bob Marley at The Rainbow”. Full volume. Sky Arts 1. Denim on denim…polyester prints, crochet hats. I lived with an abusive **it in the days of yore and he forbade me to even listen to Reggae. Imagine me! All I want from that now is the mirror on his adulterous friend’s wall which had Bob Marley curling around its contours. Years passed and I have adult children who know every Marley beat, every Reggae pioneer, know Handel’s “Messiah” script word for word and will always listen to whatever music they want.
MM: And so, the Dolls served as your catalyst to the possibilities of Rock. I would suggest that proximity to Manhattan, and later trips to London, were also springboards to wider musical appreciation. Many have taken that road and never looked back, yet you’ve always remained faithful to some of the less exploratory sub-genres. Explain.
$1.16 Trillion: American Debt Held By China. (U.S. Treasury Department, Accessed 4/10/12)
The definition is clear: in order to resist something, we have to do something to oppose it! We cannot just stand idly by and allow the devil to have his way with us. We have to fight back! We have to actively exert force against him! If we do nothing, we’re going to be destroyed! But when we stand up and fight, we will send him running! So what does it look like to “resist” him? How can we exert force in opposition against him? Here’s a few of the best ways to wage war against our most destructive enemy:
In a context dealing with religious false teachers Paul said this, “For such men are false apostles, deceitful workmen, disguising themselves as apostles of Christ. And no wonder, for even Satan disguises himself as an angel of light. So it is no surprise if his servants, also, disguise themselves as servants of righteousness. Their end will correspond to their deeds” (2 Corinthians 11:13-15, ESV).
Planes, axes (one, an enormous beheading axe), dividers—all ornately carved—are everywhere you look. Tools are suspended from the scrollwork pattern painted on the ceiling. An elaborate chair and tool chest, decorated with detailed marquetry, become display platforms for one-of-a-kind plumb bobs, trammels points, and measuring devices.
Shark Man talks fast, barely taking a breath, and flashing that shark grin at me. “Wednesday, then.”
When I received my diagnosis of Asperger’s Syndrome Ann Marie Gallagher made various recommendations one of which amused me, “To give details of Strathclyde Autism Societies social groups”. I laughed, my wife responded with, “Isn’t that Facebook?” On reflection I must admit I have embraced Social media as an acceptable substitute for face to face interaction. Social media give us an opportunity to exchange ideas without the discomfort of normal social interaction and allow us to communicate what matters to us and ignore the bits we find irrelevant.
Peter Schiff: Who, Ben Bernanke?! (laughs.) I mean, if you want the price of gold to go up, Ben Bernanke is your guy. He’s very good at that. But he’s not a gold bug personally, in the sense that he advocates gold.
But that plan for getting through thesis? Well, it works when it's just thesis stuff getting me down. It's not enough for the specific kind of loneliness you feel after you hang up (by mutual agreement), after you sit for hours in silence not knowing what to say or do (because the alternative -- speaking -- will make things worse).
To Be Continued. . . . . .
This has been a complete rant. I’m making my husband sound like such a bad person. He isn’t and I know in some ways he is trying. I’m trying to understand that its hard for this to be a reality for him right now. I just want a little more consideration.
"Lady, the meter trips at $3.50 and then its 30 cents per 1/10th of a mile after that."
Dahlia Seed - Garden Variety Split 7" ... Mint Tone Records 1994
Rating: (2) (0)
Is not be upset.
Our first shipment arrived last week and this corner of the shop has been remerchandised with some of the turquoise ceramics I picked out. Still loving turquoise.... but what about pink since it is the colour of the year? To tell the truth I hardly saw any pink in accessories... HOWEVER ...
So if you're visiting someone - or being visited - do think about these things, and don't expect to get it perfectly right. No-one should be expected to be. If you're the ill person, visitors have as much right to courtesy in what can be very difficult circumstances for them as do those being visited.
Okay, fellow babies, here's a Halloween Quickie for you!
Blackie Schwamb - St. Louis Browns
To wrap up the last few weeks, I'll bullet:
Take Verna for instance.
Slalom and jump bikes are very strong and designed for jumping, street racing, and slalom. They offer a front suspension and use very strong components dedicated to what they do. These bikes are very popular with the sport of mountain biking.
It was almost like a straight jacket when I put it on him and strapped him in--the bib went across the front and strapped back to the rug---and I stabled him for the night.
Henry M. Paulson, Jr., the Secretary of the Treasury under George W. Bush, has written an excellent account, On The Brink, ($28.99, Grand Center Publishing, division of Hachette) explaining the events surrounding the sudden imminent collapse of the nation’s financial system late into the second term. The former CEO of Goldman Sachs had assumed the job in 2006. Little did he know he would be at the center of “a perfect storm” to save the nation’s and the global economy. By all outsider accounts, that’s exactly what he did with the support of Congress and others in government, not the least of whom was President Bush who Paulson obviously respects. What makes this book so interesting is his candid story of the people and the politics that made it possible to draw back from the brink. Hachette has also released it as an audiobook ($34.98, 13 CDs, read by Dan Woren, approximately 15 hours.)
Shout it Out Loud
Who sent Jesus? Two distinct eternal Beings—The LORD GOD, and His Spirit.
I've been dying to wear dresses, but most of mine are just about the the appropriate work length. This past week we've had some on and off good weather so I busted out my dress over some jeans and I thought it would be weird, but the length totally worked. So happy to make pieces I already own more versatile. Yay.
Some people I’ve spoken to about death carry such a cavalier opinion. Sure, I guess it can be easy to schluff off the idea of infinity with a: “Well, I’ll be dead – incapable of feeling scared, regret or sorrow. Just dead. Nil.”
Sing out, children, as the little thrushes do---
I had great fun answering the search queries that led to my blog here. Now trolling keywords in blogger has become an addiction for me, along with jelly beans and cheap trowels. Judge me not…I know each one of you has a similar cringe-inducing habit. Otherwise, why the plethora of lawn gnomes, movies starring terrible actors, brisk trade in white tube socks, and extensive chocolate-themed aisles at Costco?
On a not-so-happy note, the strike in Puerto is going to be worse than most people previously thought. Here are some blogs to scope out..I’m sure you non-spanish speakers can translate them with bablefish or something. It is going to be scary for people who are there. I will keep everyone updated.
Even in our current wave of passion for making our Churches missional communities, I worry that we will forget the reason that we are on mission. As John Piper says, we cannot commend to others what we do not cherish ourselves. In other words, my invitation to others has to be on the basis that I am enjoying God myself! We forget the wine at our peril. The wineskin must not just be functional, but devotional!
New buddies: Not a new buddy, but Simon came to visit the other day, he's almost 8 months old... so hard to believe!
I’ll admit that I’m a huge fangirl of the Sherlock Holmes canon. I got the Barnes & Noble leather-bound version of The Complete Sherlock Holmes for Christmas a couple years ago and it is one of my prized possessions. Mr. Holmes was my first literary crush, and to be completely honest, remains the fictional love of my life. Well. One of them, anyway. I probably wouldn’t be able to stand him in real life, but that’s the beauty of fiction: a plethora of really interesting guys, none of whom expect you to pick up their socks.
it's many layers mocking.
Was that it? The Jeep? No.
I loved the fun die cut elements and how the sentiment was centered over them. I moved things around a little, to get the look I want, but still have a very cute little card. You can view the sketch here.
BOYCOTT AMERICAN WOMEN
You moved to L.A. to follow your dreams. About five, six years ago. Your Aunt Gladys always told you you should be in movies, and everyone concurred. And you're gonna prove Aunt Gladys right — you're gonna be a big, big star. But lately, it's been tough going. You've been out on audition after audition and you're just not getting the callbacks the way you used to. Sure, you were in soft-focus in the background of a couple of shows on the WB for a few seconds and you were once thisclose to life as the perky new intern on that earnest hospital drama. But by now, your headshot's been passed around more than that "private" video that the guy at the "modeling" agency swore was just for his personal evaluation. Maybe you're not considered a fresh face anymore, maybe — to the gatekeepers of stardom enthroned in casting offices all over town — you're even damaged goods, at this point.
Some of the children learned compulsive self-destructive behaviors: head banging, playing with their filthy diapers and eating what they played with, or shoving their fists as far down their throats as they could until they threw up whatever they’d eaten at lunch. They made no eye contact, and registered no emotion. If no one was going to pay attention to them then they’d live in the little bubble of “Self”– doing what in some strange way gave them pleasure –islands in the sea of misery which seethed around their metal cribs.
The image is one I took last winter, about this time, in Moab, Utah.
No, just few close friends with who you can talk about everything and nothing without being judged. I don't think I have a lot of very good friends, and that's good. Plus, I hate those you are gonna be your friend during 6 months, then nothing, coming back, asking you help, and disappear again. I'm not a friend on demand.
Same thing happened with computer games.
...But other times, seeing how much has been destroyed in even my short lifetime, seeing the constant development and destruction, I think the day can't come soon enough! There's a part of me, a big part of me, that just longs for something I've never even experienced: true, old growth forest. Marshes that aren't criss-crossed with paths and tire-tracks and bridges. Streams so clean and fresh and alive that I can stoop down and drink from them when I get thirsty. People think we have a wonderful quality of life, but without that, we really don't. Without a world like that, I'll always feel there's something wrong. Off. It's something constantly niggling at me in some far reach of my mind, something that's only partially soothed by spending time in nearby woods. The patches of woods available to me relax me and delight me. But I'm also always saddened. It's just so little. So polluted, and so fragile. They're still planning on building more. Destroying more of what little we have left...
Suntory's last entry into the US market is the Hibiki 12 year old blend. A very drinkable blend, Hibiki would rank well among blended whiskies available in the US were it not for the price, which tends to be around $60 (though Hi-Time has it for considerably cheaper).
After that it is back to my book. Because I have been making these flowers from the English pattern I have forgotten all the dutch terms..
Last weekend, at a show in her honor at the Kuumba Collective Art Gallery, we sold one of her biggest pieces to an art patron who had been admiring it the previous month.
COMMODITIES
(Wait. Hold on.)
- Easier to stuff
I used natural elements like the pine cones but also added some glittery picks and ornaments for sparkle. I found that the key to success was having a lot of greens with different textures and tones, making sure that some had a trailing effect, and then piling everything else in til it looked like too much, and taking just a little out. I haven't taken time to set the table as I'm still painting the legs, but as you can barely see in my photos, I refinished the table top. Hopefully the whole room reveal will happen before next Christmas.
6And before the throne there was a sea of glass like unto crystal: and in the midst of the throne, and round about the throne, were four beasts full of eyes before and behind.
Let me start by saying that I envy you your chance to avoid sending your kids to school. Our daughters went to elementary school until the middle of their 4th and 3rd grade years. Chloe had a significantly awful 1st grade year, during which time she had suicidal thoughts and wrote about hating herself. But we got through it and her 2nd grade year was better, and they are both dream students from an academic perspective, so our overall feeling was that they were doing okay. We were pretty unimpressed, though. They were in Everett's gifted program and still we were going, "Is this it?"
Two whole books of discount vouchers are given to us for FREE! Wow, this can really make you shop until you drop! P/S: If you’d love to get some SHILLS / Anosa / Dot.Dot products, please do not hesitate to get some vouchers from me :) #Sharingiscaring!
In the drama, So Ji Sub plays Kim Woo Hyun, and per AsianWiki, he “is the only son of a high ranking police officer. Woo-Hyun entered the police academy ranked first and graduated from the academy ranked first. As a detective, he then joins the cyber investigation department. Woo-Hyun then works to reveal the secrets of those that hide within the cyber world.”
I am having certain anxiety issues for my son, who is having difficulties in college and dealing with homesickness. I want to scoop him up as though he were my little boy and protect him and make everything "right"... but he's turning 21 yrs. old and needs to learn about making right choices... I'll always be here for him... but at the moment, I am hoping and praying he can get through this rough spot with his schooling without my interference; he always has my support and love!
1 (28-oz) can crushed tomatoes
But tragedy struck. A few days
Colorado- One may not mutilate a rock in a state park.
pps. You all ARE really great.
Eleven hundred and twenty two. Glinting. Glistening. All stuck in to the same depth. All protruding half-an-inch. They covered her torso. They were a masterpiece of precision, a work of art.
Holstad is a Brooklyn based artist who explores issues of sensual tension through disparate formal elements within individual works.
down the river
As I climbed back into the Trek to drive away, I stared at the piece of wood we had been using for a chock for thousands of miles. Would we never get to throw that darn thing into a campfire?
How Lia pulls off what happens next without ever seeming a) repulsively pious or b) stark staring mad, I do not know. It’s partly her tone, which is inquiring and funny, but never hectoring; and partly it’s her drawings, so heart-stoppingly neat and expressive. Mostly, though, I think it’s down to the disarming feeling that creeps over you as her sincerity (not such a rare thing in comics as in some other realms, but still pretty rare these days) quietly hits home. Lia is a knowing artist – flirting with a riding instructor in the Australian outback, her self-portrait transmutes into a luscious drawing of Penélope Cruz – but she has a vulnerable innocence that puts you firmly on her side.
I’ve outlined my objections to this scenario several times already. There is no sporting case to be made for a new club to be allowed to enter the top division ahead of every other lower league and non league team in the country. It must be made to apply to join the league structures at the bottom tier – and in competition with every other club that wishes to apply.
So when the foreman returns after being away for a couple of
silencing some of us for good
Finish making my Grandmother's quilt.
Four-wheel-drive required: no
I love her, I love her, I lover her
March 8 - Mike Starr, heavy metal bassist (Alice in Chains), 44
I used websites, newspaper articles, and books for my research, but I am far from an expert on these women and their crimes. I researched enough to find something to be inspired by and then I put the books down. If I went too far into the research, I found that I couldn’t write a poem. My mind was overwhelmed and closed off to creativity.
I’m a sucker for movies that say they’re gonna break down relationships and show all the little ticks and foibles. From He’s Just Not That Into You to Why Did I Get Married?, I’ll be front and center soaking it all in. But with Think Like A Man, instead of my usual bits of “I hear that” or “yep girls, haven’t we all been there” bonding, I laughed my butt off. Never have I been so entertained by what many have labeled a chick flick. This isn’t a chick movie. This isn’t a dude movie. This isn’t an “urban movie” (a label I dislike, as if entertainment can and should be separated by any lines in the sand). This is a fun, enjoyable film that everyone can enjoy. Well, maybe not the kids. They’d think all the kissing was gross.
Don't you love the delicate pink of the " New Dawn"?
Wall Street Journal
Maldonado was gifted the pole position after Lewis Hamilton was relegated to the back of the grid for not having enough fuel in his car to return to the garage after qualifying ended. The Williams driver almost failed to translate the pole into a win, as a poor start as well as the slow, late pit stop hampered Maldonado.
Games also have the visual aspects of these other items as well but there is a layer of interactivity that isn’t found in watching a movie or a game. These are worlds and stories that can be changed by the player’s actions.
Jeff Hunt (REP) 16.84% 860
I'd like to enter the following card in this month's CC Blog Challenge - Love Is In The Air. This is my favourite image from the SWALK range and thought that it is an ideal image to use for the love theme. In Wales we have the opportunity to celebrate Valentine's Day twice! As well as the traditional day in February, we have the Welsh Valentine's Day (Dydd Santes Dwynwen) on 25th January. The Patron Saint of Welsh Lovers is Saint Dwynwen.
We will still continue our transfer news and rumours and develop on that in the coming weeks. The CSC Interviews will be blogged at a weekly interval and will include some interesting information for those interested in this content. Currently Total Celtic has links with 80 CSC’s solely on Twitter. That’s almost 2 years of weekly content!
I had to post this because I am a little bit in love with it! I just can’t stop listening to this version of Somebody That I used To Know by Rita Ora and Gotye (who is the original singer of the song).
"Day return to Penzance mate".
Now, obviously the writers want to us to think Quinn could be Barney’s mystery bride- and that, to me, makes it clear she won’t be. However, it does leave potential for their relationship to move a lot further by the end of the series. Still, moving in already? I know Barney’s changed, but he hasn’t changed completely? What of his epic apartment designed to get women out by morning? Well, at least you can’t say their relationship will be a boring one. Even more confusing? Ted’s comment, toward the end of the episode, that he wouldn’t see Robin for a long time. Especially considering they just more or less made up, what does it mean? Is she going somewhere as a reporter? And what does that mean for everyone else?
Wallace Mills notes that Boer political notions verged on anarchism.
“You getting itchy feet to pass over? You can visit any time you choose.” Russell gives him a blank look. “OK, next time I’ll ask for your assist in finding a lost soldier; that’s mostly what I been doing lately; darn depressing… they are usually confused and darn angry. Since the elders included Washington, New York, and New Jersey in my jurisdiction, the easy hunts have been assigned to some newer recruits. Now I get only servicemen who mostly spend their time stalking members of America’s Congress; they’re fairly good at dodging me. Don’t even ask… we’re not allowed to interrupt deadly errors of the living; but inducing nightmares and thoughts are allowed and these soldiers are getting good at it. Your camaraderie will be most welcomed. Maybe we’ll sneak in a movie. You know, I’ve never actually been in a movie theater.”
We kicked off with champers and butties at Mrs VR’s, ten minutes of living the princess life which I should surely be enjoying daily. I have my own pea and everything. The traffic goddess smiled on us (no policemen around) and we pulled up ten minutes later at a prime parking spot, swooshing past the proles who had to actually, like, walk, and strolled in, our important metal pins affording pleasing status. My handbag was pawed through by the guard, but sadly nothing of interest was found.
I started piling this mass of fur on the floor, disgusted and fascinated in equal measure. The cat eventually escaped, just before it was rendered completely bald, and I sat back and stared in wondering awe at the mound. If I looked closely, I could see whole ecosystems I had unwittingly destroyed. I felt like God.
You can have anything you want, but you can't have everything so figure out what it is you really want. Is it to be a mystery novelist, a crime writer, a romance novelist, or a nonfiction writer? You have to know it in order to go after it. Once you figure it out, then think about it, dream about it, visualize achieving it. Get deep-down enthusiastic about it.
Weight: 24.4 lbs (55th percentile)
I was in law school when I found out that I was pregnant with my first daughter. I was lucky that the school allowed me to switch to part-time status after she was born and I kept going. But hopping on the Metro or driving down Connecticut Avenue to meet my husband and exchange the baby for a backpack was difficult for me. I remember pumping breastmilk in the student bathroom, wanting to die of simultaneous embarrassment and exhaustion. I remember falling asleep trying to finish my Contract Law reading with my baby sleeping in my arms. Looking back, I can see that I had many big changes all at once and on the inside I was overwhelmed - I'd graduated college in the spring, married in the summer, moved across country, started law school, and was still trying to figure out how to manage all of the above when I found out I was pregnant. When my first was 6 months old, I realized I was pregnant with my second daughter (which helped explain the exhaustion) and reality set in - I didn't want to juggle children with law school. I wanted to be fully present at home. So I put my law degree on hold and decided to go back after a year or two.
This story was a product of the bits and pieces of stories, randomly told by my mom , aunt Naty and sometimes by my dad. Now I know why we he named his kids with American names. Now I know why we grew up watching mostly American shows, even documentaries in whch I am now thankful of. Maybe this explains why, when my dad had a bicycle for a gift, took good care of it even to his last days.
Lemon Cream Frosting
Day 4s challenge is the Linen Closet.
I say 'yes' to things I should not say yes to.
"Three From A Phantom Saloon"
We note that one of the grounds on which the Judge made her order is that NAMA failed to take into account, as a relevant consideration, the availability of investors/purchasers for our loans.
The weirdest thing happened too, there was this girl, she’d been in some of my classes and we had opinions about each other; to her I was annoying, and well, weird and not a good person. And to me she was a royal, well, I shouldn’t say “bitch” but she was to me back then, and she was a free and popular person to a bottom feeder like myself.
The Great Gatsby by F. Scott Fitzgerald
Nicola Jadeja (Rouse), discussed the recent CJEU hearing on Medeva and highlighted the potential differences between one-pot (e.g. Medeva) versus co-administration combinations (e.g, Takeda). Nicole vividly described the CJEU as a bit like Eurovision - flags, crowds, interpreters...
4. Branded (new song)
Meg was especially pleased when we came across Otto Tootsi Plohound. She has a friend who adores this clothing store. Great name, Otto Tootsi Plohound!
The storm had come on suddenly, several hours before. We had tried to wait it out under a overhang of rock out on the moor. It started to get dark, though, and we began to worry we would end up spending the night out there.
Great Magazine, right on time, very well may get the subscription.
Another snowy day here in Massachusetts. I feel like January has been one gigantic blur of a snowstorm.
2 increases
A short and sweet post for you today. It was my turn to post Step by Step Thursday on Blackleaf Studio. I gathered two beautiful Clip art sets called Vintage Clocks and Spa and created this wonderful Calendar for the year 2011:
Mercedes-Benz, to me, is split into two camps. On the one hand you have Mercedes-Benz, maker of fine, luxury and relaxed vehicles. These vehicles are driven by gentlemen who want refinement. Your local doctor probably has a C-Class or if he’s really well-off, has an E-Class. His wife most likely has an A-Class. If she has Stepford Wife aspirations, then she probably has an ML in her crosshairs. Politicians the world over lust after the S-Class, in black with the armoured window option ticked. Then, on the other hand, there are three letters that make petrolheads everywhere sit up and notice. A, M and G. AMG is the sporting/motorsport arm of the German marque and they have the job of turning your normal, run-of-the-mill Mercedes models into potent performance machines.
And every knee on earth shall bow
I remember being disappointed on hearing this score in its entirety – another case of high expectations making it impossible for a score to deliver. This title track has a hint of the East that surfaces within Desplat’s brooding emotional material. It’s a score that needs to be listened to in manageable bite-sized pieces.
Mark Driscoll states in his book, Doctrine, that “Philosophers have long sought to find a way to winsomely and persuasively reconcile the character of God with the reality of sin. Gottfired Leibniz fire coined the term theodicy in 1710 to describe this quest for understanding.” While there are several theodicies, two of the “more important” theodicies include the soul-making theodicy and the free will theodicy. The soul-making theodicy “argues that God allows evil so as to make it possible for humans to develop certain desirable virtues. The free-will theodicy “argues that God had to allow for the possibility of evil if he wished to give humans (and angelic beings) free will. Theodicies are often distinguished from defenses, which argue that it is reasonable to believe that God has reasons for allowing evil even if we do not know what those reasons are.”
We then see Det. Trupo, at his house in the morning answering his doorbell. He opens the door to find a live turkey in a cage outside his door. He then sees his prized sports car blow up. Frank has an elaborate Thanksgiving dinner at his mother's house with the whole family attending. We also see some scenes of junkies overdosing. After dinner Frank's family gathers outside. He asks his nephew Steve, who he had arranged a tryout with the Yankees, why he hadn't tried out. Steve tells him he doesn't want to play ball anymore, as he'd rather be like Frank. Frank is called away by Huey, who tells him there's a problem. Frank and Huey visit Nikki Barnes at his nightclub. Frank tells him to stop cutting his Blue Magic, and if he has to, to call it something else. as the name stands for his quality of product and weakens his brand name. Nikki gets insulted by Frank's demanding tone, but agrees.
The countless funerals of family, friends, coworkers and fellow churchgoers I attended from 1994 to 1998 are testament to the cold hard reality of the genocide.
Be sure to encourage an praise your child every time you do something therapeutic that they tolerated. Recognize their attempt if they didn't tolerate it well. It's hard work for these kids (and you) and progress can be slow. Don't give up and don't let your child give up.
I am still Fighting...fighting with FAITH as my weapon...(you should too)
Reading? One straw Revolution, by Masanobu Fukuoka, a book about natural farming and no dig growing. It's a great read so far and makes so much sense. I have recently become aware of the Permaculture movement and this style of gardening really appeals to me. As we are moving to a farm soon and will have 4 acres of land to tend the 'do little' route appeals to me!
--A friend shared with me she has been clean and sober for six years. She comes to the Mission to get spiritually fed and to give back. After joining us for Bible study at lunch on Friday, she cleaned our bathrooms.
Finally, I’d buy myself a deserted island for those time that writer’s block begins to drive me insane and I’m tempted to give my 1/2 Billion to the developers of Farmville in the form of robust crops and huge flocks of happy sheep.
I am very happy and excited and a little overwhelmed with the insane talent that be at the 2nd annual CTN-X Animation EXPO this year in November. I was lucky enough to secure a table at this event and will be selling various books of my art which I'm printing as I speak. And I am just a drop in the bucket compared to the amazing talent that will there under one roof.
His other prayer lacks not in his faith and reverence towards heavenly father:
We pick up after ourselves with machines,
We have the capacity and understanding today, through our sciences and industries, our infrastructure and institutions to comprehensively transform our civilization and our personal and communal existence into a form far more ethical, moral, sustainable, fulfilling, uplifting and beautiful, however our lack of real emotional engagement with life, with its mud and dirt and piss and blood, our lack of empathy and passion, forms our only real collective obstacle. It ensures that the very real obstacles presented by our highly intelligent thinking and powerful institutions and systems, remain real.
We would either pick up Route 66 in Missouri or in Oklahoma, getting there either by a northern route through Illinois to St. Louis or a more southerly one, down to North Carolina and through the hills of Tennessee, accompanied by country music and fire-and-brimstone preachers on the radio. Sometimes we would be driving Andrew’s trusty old 1950 International Harvester milk truck whose maximum speed was 55 miles per hour, and at other times my first car, a 1966 Ford Falcon, with its “three-on-the-tree” gear stick on the steering column. In the 1970s, with gasoline prices ranging from 39 to 69 cents per gallon (even after the oil crisis of 1973), three people traveling together could drive across country and back for $40 to $70 each.
Many South Africans rightly deserve to feel deeply let down by the performance of their government and insulted when it feigns shock and surprise at violence that has become commonplace in South Africa.
The world of self publishing that is taking shape around us as we stand and watch is both exciting and more than a little overwhelming. Writing a novel is hard enough (which I’ll talk about later) and in all honesty is still something I’m working on. But on top of that, if you want to self publish, you need to be a shrewd marketer, promoter and business manager with a thorough knowledge of social media and networking. At least, that’s what everyone is telling me.
In my class you hear a lot of this:
All because I was empowered by him (Kṛṣṇa).
- Father-in-law/ Father Too much involve in family matter.
It’s 06:00am, the kids are up early and are sitting in bed with us while Mrs D and I snooze the alarm clock for one last time. Miss D is chatting to Little Dude. ‘Why is she talking like that?’ I think in my half-conscious state. She’s speaking loudly, with an over-enthusiastic upwards inflection on almost every word. It sounds bizarre, it’s quite annoying, and somehow strangely familiar. Then it hits me…
I must remember that I'm not necessarily waiting on a helicopter (or a pill) at all. My trust and hope is in God.
- You can scroll down to the bottom of this post to find the recipe for these muffins.
The American drew closer as the Chinese scouts became more engrossed and confused. They stopped briefly to talk and then began working their way back in the direction from which they had come.
Is it Build a Green Bakery? Or Birdbath Bakery? Or is this naming business trickery to ratchet up buzz? Does it matter? No, so long as the cookies and scones and muffins and croissants remain so tasty (and the ingredients, organic).
Becomes my sunrise
Students work in pairs to play and one partner pulls out a digital time and places it on the matching clock on their board. If they have already covered that time up, they must return the digital time and their turn is over. If they get a "Time is Up!" they have to return one of the times that they already matched!
10/11/2008 - Toronto, ON - Massey Hall
Sorry for my lack of posting yesterday. I was too busy waiting in line for some Concords. Anyway, I hope this day finds you all with your loved ones, surrounded by good food and, of course, lots of loot.
“Lottery ticket”
5. Roll dough into walnut sized balls and place 2 inches apart on the prepared cookie sheets. Using a fork, make a cross-hatch design on the top, smooshing them so they are about 1/2 inch tall.
“I think that’s locked.”
It didn’t take long before the two of them had things under control, though. Paul realised he had to be more precise with his commands and Buster picked up the differences in the commands we used and the ones Paul used (there weren’t huge differences, but because Paul’s movements tend to be jerky, they weren’t always instantly recognisable to Buster).
Bishops ‘moving beyond Jesus’
Zack and Miri Make a Porno (2008)
Pub/club you frequent?
Well. Monday has been eventful enough to get its own recap, so for now I'll just backtrack a couple of days to last weekend.
I have heard about this method of making your own decals before, so I do not claim to be the original or invent the method, but that does not mean I'm any less thrilled to share this with you.
Me: You want Ponder to take off his shirt?
Martin opens its district season Saturday against United, at 1 p.m., in a game between district heavyweights that finished ranked one and two at the end of last season.
My (and my sister's) relationship with my parents is really good. We talk to each other about everything from how we've been feeling, what we've been doing, interesting links online or news stories, what our friends are up to... We don't stray away from subjects such as drug use and other illegal activity. I'll cheerfully announce that a friend is taking up graffiti, and Emi will call to say she's headed out to a bar after band practice, so expect her home late. I've never worried about coming home smelling like weed. And because of the relationship we have, my sister and I have never hesitated to get our parents help when we're worried about a friend doing hard drugs, and we'd never hesitate to call instead of driving home with someone who's drunk.
And those four sassy beauties below are the cookbooks I'm anxiously awaiting. (Some are on their way already and some are about to be released):
Leave it to Uncle Hayden to step in and offer this juicy bit of knowledge that he read from an actual real live living book, of all things!
If you've got a Kindle, it's available as an ebook too (and cheaper that way). Also check out Linda's How to books for Kindle:
YOU SAY YOU WANT SOME MONEY FROM ME TONIGHT
It's a story of loss and caution - don't mess with things you don't understand. And the reason it freaked me out is that I love tarot cards, I have several decks of my own and I love shuffling them, playing with them but I hardly ever venture to tell fortunes with them. I like them for the archetypes they represent but this story has made me feel a bit itchy under the skin. So thanks, Catherine Johnson!
Remember Air America Radio? The left-wing network that was gonna kick the combined asses of Rush Limbaugh, Sean Hannity and Glenn Beck? Yep, they were loaded for bear: Al Franken, Janeane Garofalo, Rachel Maddow and Thom Hartman, just to name a scary few. Air America went live in 2004 – suffered through terrible ratings, financial scandals, two bankruptcies and a garage sale – and was mercifully put out of its misery in 2010.
I wish I could laugh.
“Congratulation Park-shi. You will become a father. Your wife is three weeks pregnant.”
i mean...it's summer! can you blame me?
Perhaps the most unique feature of Juniper Springs, aside from the spring itself, is the unique CCC-built millhouse. Completed in 1935-1936, this structure was the result of innovative thinking that overcame the problem of getting electricity to the park. When Juniper Springs was developed, the nearest source of electric power was then miles away. Without the money to pay for running electric lines to the recreation area, the CCC generated its own.
When they are ready, let them cool for a few minutes and prepare a bowl with powdered sugar. Take the warm cookies and place them in the sugar, coating them completely and then let them finish cooling of on a cookie rack.
As with any problem this country has, I look to the Constitution for advice.
In the film “Green Dolphin Street, Donna Reed’s character flees to a convent upon learning about her sister becoming involved with the men she loved. This convent can only be reached at low tide. She awakens after spending the night on the island, and seeks shelter with the sisters. It could only be this special place.
With all the bars wrapped in the foil, you can add the outer wrapper. This is the easier part by far and you can knock out a bunch of them in no time. Place the wrapped bar onto the middle of the back side of the wrapper with the tape side up. (The chocolate bars have a beveled edge to them so you have to wrap them like this.)
Project Vote and ACORN have not gone away, they’ve just been splintered and renamed. On top of still being in existence, even after Hannah Giles and James O’Keefe proved the group was willing to help with the sex trafficking of underage girls, the Obama Justice Department is working directly with these groups in an effort to steal the White House.
Therapist: You are fine. Kids have a way of making life more meaningful. Agreed. You are OK. Caution is good.
I Play Chicken with the Train, Cowboy Troy
Or are they reptoids using hologram tech to create confusion?
You can see a list of the Scientific Program Committee members here, which includes John W. Mellors, MD.
The Lord may let others be honored and put forward while keeping you hidden in obscurity because He wants to produce some choice, fragrant fruit for His coming glory, which can only be produced in the shade.
Eventually, I had no more dishes to do and no choice but to lace up my sneakers and take off running.
THE phenomenal success of a ”crazy idea” by a Stanford University professor, Sebastian Thrun, to open free online enrolments in his artificial intelligence course has pundits sounding the death knell for higher education as we know it.
Jubie Watts is a young teen from Charlotte, North Carolina, leaving for a family vacation in Florida with her family and their hired maid, Mary Luther. With a tumultuous family life, Jubie must find her way amid an abusive, philandering father, a weak mother, a doted-on older sister, a disappearing younger sister and a toddling brother. Heading deeper into the South, she notices the climate of racial unrest, but could never anticipate the dreadful turn of events when the family car crashes in a small town in Georgia.
“Every airline must use the airbridge, for the convenience and safety of the people.
Recent research into ancient southern African history, carried out by people like Dr. Cyril Hromnik, Richard Wade, Johan Heine, and a few others, has revealed that Africa was once home to a vast community of intelligent humans. Amazing evidence of ancient temples, and the remains of a huge ancient metropolis that once formed part of a larger community that is estimated to be in the region of 10,000 square miles, are just some of the incredible discoveries that are now being researched.
I've had (for me) a pretty long break from the traveling. And many thanks to Carl and Jana for giving me a chance to experience living under a roof again for a few months. It has been great to have luxuries such as a refrigerator, shower, heat, and cats.
form the fear of being wronged,
Throughout that time, the only thing that she ever attempted (I say attempted because she'd often fail) to force was math. I was somewhere around 10 or 11 when I started completely refusing to do math workbooks, and, well, I guess that's when we moved over to full fledged unschooling!
Other than chapter 10, the other great parts of this book are interspersed throughout. The Alley Cat Race is pretty awesome (Chapter 9), and there's a cool scene where the author races this other messenger with a stripped down track bike (Chapter 6) and then says:
It was the trip of a lifetime, will be long remembered for its tropical beauty, kind and gentle people, and of course, all that wonderful fresh tea!
#58... Linda Carson
Remember the
Aspects of Design Lace 1
There is a dark side to the American Dream, but it’s usually left out of the mythology. Andrew Carnegie’s autobiography, The Gospel of Wealth, tells of a Scottish bobbin boy who came to these shores with just the clothes on his back and became a multimillionaire in the iron and steel industry through hard work and bold ideas.
Penna and David have been dating for almost a year before David has to go away to Iraq. As Penna tries to not fall to pieces, she's now faced with what seems like a giant void. The long summer days stretch out before her to what seems like eternity, and nothing feels like it has any meaning with David gone. But slowly, Penna starts to pick up the pieces of her life again, and she takes heart in making new friends and soldiering on as best she can-- no matter what life throws at her.
And guess what? Stamping Scrapping will price match. If you find a lower price, place the link to where you found it at in the comment section of the order form at Stamping Scrapping and they will immediately refund the difference after you place your order. How can you go wrong?
It is a very different beer from our LA-31. We only use late hop additions that gives our beer a great hop flavor yet leaves smooth and mellow hop bitterness. I think the Dogfish would go great pared up with American style pepperoni pizza, a spicy meatball sub, or cheese enchiladas. We like to think our LA-31 really compliments our regions more refined cuisine, like gumbo, jambalaya or sauce picante.
Band Lineup
Milk thistle (Silybum mariannum) protects the liver and assists in the detoxification process by increasing glutathione supply in the liver. Glutathione is the enzyme primarily involved in the detoxification of toxic heavy metals including lead.
Offer your services to someone who could benefit from your talents. This may change their perspective as well as your own.
Mojo Hanna by Andre Williams
Well, on this current afternoon, he outright refused to empty the dishwasher. So, we followed our normal routine. I had just shut the front door and walked back to my kitchen when there was a knock on my back door. I turned to find a K9 officer in my backyard with his trusty police dog in tow.
Ink: distress inkt walnut stain & copic markers (close up hier onder)
Obama won't be having Bush and co. prosecuted for their use of torture (not new news, I know, but like I said, I've tried to keep my mouth shut). He said the use of torture showed America had "lost our moral bearings".
I don't have anything cheetah print...and this would be awesome to have in my wardrobe :)
I may be wrong, but I’ve long thought that one question above all would haunt my imagined historian of our future: why did we do it? Given that our entire civilization had plenty of warning, and that ten minutes of unprejudiced thought ought to have been enough to demonstrate to anybody the absurdity of expecting to get away with infinite economic growth on a finite planet, why didn’t we do what must, to the eyes of the future, look like the obviously right decision, and downshift to a less energy- and resource-intensive steady state economy while we had the chance? Why, instead, did we keep on lurching blindly forward on a one-way street headed straight to history’s compost bin, all the while angrily shouting down the few that tried to warn us of where we were going?
Amy Winehouse - Live Lollapalooza, 5 August 2007
8:00 – This Frontier Needs Heroes, Kath Bloom, Marcellus Hall @ Bruar Falls $6 (21+)
Today you gave me a simple ultimatum. Show you proof of a difference a change I’ve made with my life. Or risk losing you as a counselor, a guide and most importantly a friend. I was really confused at first. I was over thinking too much, made my whole afternoon awful thinking about what to do and what to show you. How could I prove to you or show you I did something made a difference in my personal life. To be honest not much was coming to mind. Then everything became simple. I asked myself, what are the most important changes I’ve wanted to make in my life?
When you have filled out the form, save your work on your home computer, and then e-mail the completed form to me. My e-mail address is khiggins@ridgefield.org.
Shortly afterwards, three Israeli jets dropped bombs only 250 metres from a UN convoy on which I was travelling, blasting a house 30 feet into the air in front of my eyes.
which has more tomatoes in it than any recipe I have seen elsewhere, her goulash, a delicious dish made with yellow summer squash and sour cream, and, of course, what she called nockerli and what most everyone else calls spaetzle.
Margaret Mahy is one of my all-time favourite writers and, though I don't think this is her best book (the Changeover still has that status for me), it has some wonderful ideas and moments in it. And there is more to come from her, I hope.
store, and maintain the knowledge, skills, and special equipment that would enable you to do at least one third-world job. If you are a similar, then you are already set. If you are a derivatives trader,
I have been asking for a new trashcan for about 2 years now. FINALLY....it is mine! And, it is no ordinary trashcan. It be fancy. It be Simple Human. I exclaimed to Beau, "I can't believe it is Simple Human....you really went all out." His response, "What my baby wants, my baby gets."
It should be a great day for a good cause.
1 mechanical
Backlinked entries will be deleted. If your blog post is before the publish date of this challenge then this is backlinking so it will be deleted.
I'm speaking on the Sunday morning, I believe.
Life is this beautiful wonderful journey, and although everything tells us that we should be in high-flying corporate positions and married with two kids by 35, we really don’t have to. Although the media says that we have to be in committed relationships to enjoy Christmas and Valentine’s Day, wouldn’t it be better to be in a relationship with someone who really is worth committing to?
and the gas man leaveth to no fanfares
The sexual warmth is definitely there—but the rest of it has sharp edges and I’m finding it all unsettling and finding myself wanting to withdraw from it all. I have to admit that I am feeling anger at him for some reason, multi-stranded reasons. His warmth can be deceptive. Tho he speaks sweet words and can be open and trusting, there is also that coolness—and I begin to have an inkling of some things about him that could get to me.
Method for skin
- Fortune Cookie
I grant I never saw a goddess go, -
It can be held.
Oh....and I made angel food cake. Have you done that? I was absolutely terrified that it wouldn't work out....but it did!! yum. I knew I could count on Alton Brown to lead me through step by step.....although I would recommend not starting such a thing at 10 o'clock at night...it really could have been a disaster.
married....somebody doesn't know that marriage adds a new son or
I have increasingly found myself becoming a sincere long time fan of so many hand crafted online stores through their quality and reasonable prices. Be prepared to become addicted to great quality and uniqueness.
If you do not immediately think of the workout scene, here it is to refresh your memory:
SMRT trains are having delays and disruptions on an almost daily basis that even the mainstream media has stopped reporting on it altogether.
And once you've painted them they're waterproof!
Forget about us for a while
At Zanuck’s request, Temple’s parents agreed to four films a year from their daughter (rather than the three they wished), and the child star’s contract was reworked with bonuses to sweeten the deal. A succession of films followed: The Little Colonel, Our Little Girl, Curly Top, and The Littlest Rebel in 1935. Curly Top and The Littlest Rebel were named to Variety‘s list of top box office draws for 1935.[44] In 1936, Captain January, Poor Little Rich Girl, Dimples,[note 6] and Stowaway were released.
A. From war to war to war
The inspiration came from a fabulous feast we were invited to last Christmas day at the home of some restaurant-owning friends who had built a wood-fired oven in their back yard. One of the the appetizers they sent out was a wonderful smokey dish of roasted grapes and walnuts. So simple, but delicious, it had been playing on my mind ever since a more recent roasted grape salad at Incanto had reminded me of it. Now that grape season is upon us, I wondered if I could riff on that idea a little and create something inspired by the grape and walnut combination in my far-less-glamorous-than-a-wood-fired-oven electric stove.
And mocked the cross and flame.
I did all the above except I used a cute little dragon fly instead of a butterfly and added little diamond cut rhinestones to each corner of the die cut. These little rhinestones add a touch of elegance.
A female attendee outbid a man in the audience by $5,000 to win the kiss.
Why do they whine? Children whine because they want our attention.
in the tall grass, or deer
might as well been a new fantasy world, for all I knew (or cared). The French-sounding names were exotic and the politics felt exactly like a complicated chess game, (the author's intention). There is gritty reality behind the impossible choices, which I absolutely loved. So often, especially when big, multiple kingdoms are involved, the answer is obvious & predictable, so “impossible” was refreshingly frustrating.
I followed the provided recipe using local napa cabbage for the greens, substituting soba noodles for the egg noodles and adding cilantro for visual flair (and flavor) at the end. The broth was very delicate, too much so for my taste. I ended up adding lime juice, s'rircha and additional soy sauce and sesame oil to amp up the flavor yet still felt like something was missing. Perhaps the soba noodles were too much for the broth? Either way I don't plan to revisit the recipe.
Didn't have much chance to enjoy the city, but I did have dinner with some friends I met here in Dar es Salaam who have since been moved to Nairobi. Amazing to share time with friends even after they've left. It's the one major occupational hazard (or personal?) that comes with choosing to work internationally, your friends are constantly on the move, just like yourself. Someone is either coming or going, and it's never certain when or whether you'll see them again.
Animal Man #8
he ain't prejudice he's just, made in america
Adaptive.
I love homeschool...
1/4 tsp. almond extract
Earlier this spring, I discovered mock smock and I've been whipping up sun dresses galore ever since. Mock Smock material comes pre-smocked for super simple, but absolutely adorable, dress-making. Even beginning sewers will be able to easily make these super cute frocks!
best part of this place is everything is FREE
I had never even heard of Obscura Day before a mention popped up in my Twitter feed a week or so ago, but I was immediately intrigued. So many people associate being a traveler with getting out their wallets, brushing off their passports, and heading to some exotic, distant land; however, many of the pleasures of traveling can be found by just staying where you are and checking out something that you would normally skip. Obscura Day would be my chance to do just that.
#2 - Part of me thinks I was sabotaging myself to gain some weight so I could go back to losing phase. I know what to do in losing phase, I was comfortable in losing phase. Maintenance freaks me the hell out. Still. I am working through the emotions and trying to breathe through maintenance and not be so scared of it. I think it's because I don't want to be a failure and gain this weight back ever, so if I can always be in the losing phase I should never fail right? Maybe I need to come up with a different name besides maintenance. I don't know why that word makes my anxiety rise like crazy.
1x05: The Wolf And The Lion = 9/10, 1x06: A Golden Crown = 10/10,
Leaves. Quince. Autumn love.
As for the trip from NY to PA and return, I was glad Sandy did the driving. Even though we made several stops for the boys to stretch their legs and for lunch, I could barely sit any longer. This morning I bought a small pillow to sit on for my drive back to CA, and I sure hope it helps - otherwise I don't know how I will make it. I just don't understand why I can't sit for that long as I have traveled so much in my life and it has never bothered me before now.
In our parents’ generation, it happened with Big Tobacco.
During my Philosophy interview at Bristol University, one verbal question I was asked on logic was…
the MITM arrived safely tuesday evening and for a change, so did his luggage! of course, yesterday it rained like a mofo here and we're looking at heavy rains, thunderstorms and possible flooding into the weekend. he's just happy to be home and out of deepestdarkestafrica. the storms he experienced before he left the other continent are now slowing making their way across the atlantic to the eastern seaboard as tropical depressions with the possibility of turning into hurricanes.* we'll see.
BUT YOU WOULD BE WRONG.
“These media houses have committed a lot of offences that are detrimental to Islam, and we don’t have the power to forgive them. We will take revenge on them by God’s grace, some of these media houses have been categorised into three groups.
Cast on 8 stitches with the backwards loop cast on technique or the regular way.
I'm a sap when it comes to weddings and I will admit that I cried once or twice during the ceremony. (As an aside, I also cry when I watch TLC's A Baby Story...people giving birth gets me every time.) I also gave a little cheer when they had their first kiss(es) on the balcony. And how cute was the little attendant who put her hands over her ears as they were kissing? She'll probably grow up being recognized as 'that little girl.' CUTE!
We are flawed and human and we each do our best every day, and I love writing it.
Driving itself wasn’t so bad – the weather was good, passengers were sleeping, vehicle working fine. We actually made pretty good progress and made it to the town of Williams at about 8PM.
So after some online shopping, I found my desk. $39.99 at Walmart. It was available in my local store, so I went right away to pick it up.
Which author would you like to interact with?
I’ve sampled many different flavors I enjoy
punaḥ punaś carvita-carvaṇānām
Just got back from a few fabulous days at beautiful Black Point with the family.
The problem with cat glaucoma is that the blind eye bulges very unattractively. Some owners opt for surgery, which involves removing the blind eye and ﬁtting the socket with a silicone false eye.
The duel was widely reported, mainly because the story got out that the ladies were bare-breasted. Having had a quarrel, these high-born ladies, whose families comprised a large part of the ruling elite of both Germany and the Austro-Hungarian empire, decided to settle the matter beyond doubt.
‘Sure’. I said, and he caught me by my waist, and shouted to Liam, ‘You go in, McCall. We’re coming.’
In this post, however, I am speaking of public figures, polititions, etc. Every day, it seems, there is yet another revelation and/or accusation of some guy in public life who couldn't keep his pants zipped! How often do we read a headline that yet another "Good Time Charlie's Got the Blues"!
who has reappeared
And oh no, it's mad old David Whitaker back at the typewriter, or at least that's how it started. In 1968 the originally titled 'Invaders From Mars' was written by Whitaker for Patrick Troughton's Doctor. In 1969 the script was reworked for Jon Pertwee and renamed 'The Carriers Of Death.' The scripts were handed to Terrance Dick's assistant Trevor Ray who reworked episode one. After going through three different producers, Peter Bryant, Derrick Sherwin and finally Barry Letts, Whitaker was unavailable and or uninterested in reworking his scripts further so episodes two and three were rewritten by Terrance Dicks and Malcolm Hulke, and Four-Seven by Hulke alone. This complicated process sadly reflects on the finish product.
As much as I hate to admit it, I’m worried about my Mom. She is under an insane amount of stress right now. This is the last thing she needs hanging over her head. I myself, am not under that much stress anymore.
Hello again everyone!!! It's Tarrah here again with you today to show you a project that I just loved creating to share with you all.
Welcome to "THE CARD OF THE WEEK!"
"So very sorry for the loss of your baby. Welcome to the club."
How effective is this strategy? Based on several reports that I’ve read I’d say its of marginal efficiency, and it will strongly depend on how effectively sealed the room was, but it is still better than nothing.
In the 1960s carbon-14 was measured in Great Basin bristlecone pines and it showed scientists that there was a change in radioactive carbon-14 production over hundreds of years due to the bombardment of cosmic radiation. The radioactive dates did not match the tree rings, and in fact the tree ring dates were older.
While they were still incredulous for joy and were amazed, he asked them, “Have you anything here to eat?”
Just as Johann Hari has rightly fallen victim to the philosophical oxymoron of ‘the good lie’, so too in 2009 did every medium to the Left of the Daily Express vilify my then site for raising the most open secret in Westminster: that Gordon Brown was in a place so mentally and physically dysfunctional, his ability or not to be Prime Minister was a matter not so much for public interest as popular panic. So trust me, I know all about the power of the Left to muzzle.
I am a writer, speaker and book mentor who took a long path to publication. Ten years spent in obscurity. Years and miles of unpublished words. I‘m the poster child for Malcolm Gladwell’s Outliers, where he shares the secret of “genius.” (Here’s the unglamorous truth: Genius comes from 10,000 hours of practice.) So I wrote my 10,000 hours, then started finding success in small venues–regional magazines, a local paper, then national magazines.
Whoa! So I thought I would get back to blogging but wow so much has happened lately. The hubby has been on several training courses, we went to Las Vegas and had the most wonderful time, took a trip to TX and AL to visit family over Spring Break and more!
Then the BBC (Book Blogger Convention, not British Broadcasting Corporation!) people said that the registration for that would also get us into Book Expo, which is the 25th-27th. And, you know, I'd love to do that, but this is getting ridiculous! I suppose I could fly out on Wednesday and spend Thursday at BEA. But, oh, all those nights in a New York hotel add up! Thank goodness I'll be staying in the dorms for the reunion. Because I am so tempted by BEA!
So you know that anything you read here (and especially any photos, which are only included because... I like a post with photos) is offered in the spirit of "If I can do it, so can you!"
“prestigious” university–”You are not
I smile hooray I finally found an advantage to my ability to fall over a spec of dust!
And the other poor decision I made was the filling that I chose to make. I wanted a white filling, but didn't want to use white chocolate ganache (I'm not a huge fan of white chocolate), and I also didn't want just a regular vanilla buttercream, so I settled on making a nice cream cheese filling. Unfortunately, this resulted in a melty filling that didn't hold up well once out of the fridge.
I also want to share a card I created using
Okay, so you KNOW your "hobby" has morphed into a full-fledged PROBLEM when the teensy little livingroom of your teensy little condo starts looking like the back room of a Habitat for Humanity RE-STORE! In my many years as a mental health professional, I've heard it said that ADMITTING your addiction is the first step to overcoming it.
Well, I discovered the second easiest daal to make today. This was inspired by something K cooked in the early years of our marriage when she shocked me by not roasting the moong daal before cooking it. I remember getting quite agitated then.
God has the power and the authority to fix us all, but rather than forcing us to conform to His ways, he gives us a choice. He gives us the tools and the direction, but He does not stand over us nagging us to change. He loves us more than we can imagine and yet He gently guides us. He does not get angry when we do not change as He would prefer. We should all follow this example of how our loving Father allows us to fix ourselves.
I had all of those, plus much more. And I'm feeling pretty good.
Despite people’s first impressions of me, I laugh, giggle, smile, grin (and even occasionally laugh-snort) all the time. I laugh at myself and with myself. I laugh at the world and the irony often found it. I laugh at stupid things like comedy movie headshots, and I laugh at cats that lose their balance. I laugh at the five inches of butt crack showing on the guy in front of me at the grocery store, and I laugh at the old lady who farts in the middle of a restaurant…
I like Steve Keen and am working to merge his economic theories with those of us who want to issue a debt free currency. That would save taxpayers 500 billion dollars a year in interest payments on government debt as we would have none. In fact I would favor an Amendment making government debt at the federal, state and local levels illegal. I am writing this in response to a video in which Dr Keen claims to disprove the idea of the 11th marble. In it he says traditionalists argue that if you borrow ten dollars and are required to pay a dollar in interest at the end of the year, the bankers did not create sufficient money to pay both the principal and the interest. They created ten marbles but not the eleventh.
As they went out, they found a man of Cyrene, Simon by name. They compelled this man to carry his cross. And when they came to a place called Golgotha (which means Place of a Skull), they offered him wine to drink, mixed with gall, but when he tasted it, he would not drink it. And when they had crucified him, they divided his garments among them by casting lots. Then they sat down and kept watch over him there. And over his head they put the charge against him, which read, “This is Jesus, the King of the Jews.” Then two robbers were crucified with him, one on the right and one on the left. And those who passed by derided him, wagging their heads and saying, “You who would destroy the temple and rebuild it in three days, save yourself! If you are the Son of God, come down from the cross.”
Shimer prides itself on being the kind of school that rewards hard work. Students who are capable of helping themselves are supposed to do well at Shimer, but it is ridiculous to expect students straight out of high school, hell, even students who are in their mid-twenties or thirties, to intuitively know that they are doing poorly if you don’t tell them. I have talked to student after student after student who feels alone at Shimer. Students who want to do well, but need a push that their facilitators don’t give them. I have heard countless people say they feel like their opinions are met with condescension by their peers and no one does anything about it.
Hi everyone. Wanted to show you a card I made with the fish image from I Brake For Digis. I love this adorable fish. I'm sending this out to my friends grandson who I just love so much. He had the chance to go to Disney this weekend for his birthday and they send me photos of him at Sea World so I thought a fish would be appropriate this year for his card.
SF is truly an international city, at least by American standards. One hears more languages and sees more ethnic diversity walking down the street than even in New York, where things often are a bit more segregated into ethnic neighborhoods. Yet for all of the international flavor, I’m not sure that very many residents ever leave the bay area. If they did, there might be a bit more diversity in thought about how to solve the proliferation of homeless people. Instead, it seems that the problem is made worse due to the lack of any dissenting voice.
Healdsburg
Sergeant Nik LaRoche thumbs a confessional letter from Charlie Rudder and realizes what first looked like a botched burglary and assault is going to be some kind of difficult.
It is shocking to see the way these kids respond.
Jet lag usually lasts 24–48 hours after travel has taken place. In that short time period, the body adjusts to the time change, and with enough rest and daytime exposure to sunlight, it returns to normal circadian rhythm.
It’s possible that some will take some time getting into it.
#3: The Etsy shop has been opened. Buy from me. Custom order from me. This is absolutely shameless, non-subliminal advertising.
The new ‘Alliances’ project will see Slam co-producing with friends and peers from around the globe, beginning with Gary Beck, Pan-Pot & Italo Boyz. PARA014 sees Slam embark on their first ‘Alliances’ project with fellow Glaswegian, Gary Beck. As two linchpins of techno the product has a lot to live up to. The result of this collaboration is a controlled blend of drive and groove primed to work the dancefloor. The opening track on the EP, and the series, is the uncompromising ‘Verto’. Ravey synth-lines and snares rolls flow in liquid swells of suspense and tension as the track pushes forward in its stripped and organic form. The AA-side, ‘South’ oozes groove and restraint, albeit at a slightly slower pace. The ‘South’ bassline retains the drive, and is steady and rolling, flowing back and forth throughout the duration. Hovering synths and a spine-chilling vocal are utilised at the breaks allowing the track motion and lucidity. This first in ‘Alliances’ series sets the bar high, with a no-nonsense approach to the dancefloor.
My crafting/diy mojo is still lagging. I have a few projects that I could work on, but I'm feeling seriously blah and unmotivated. Not too sure why, but hopefully it passes soon. I am anxiously awaiting the arrival of my little nephew Oliver (due Feb 15th) and I find myself feeling nostalgic about my own little babies. Being almost 6 years old and almost 3 years old makes them most certainly NOT babies anymore :( Just thought I'd post a few pics of my little bugs when they were tiny. I miss squeezing them and I fear that poor little Oliver will most definitely suffer because of this. I'll try not to squeeze him too hard ;)
I remember one lady I worked with that looked like a Barbie doll. She was so pretty, had a nice figure and had a wonderful and kind personality.
Tell me please if you would like to participate and then pop over to visit Jennifer and tell her as well -- that will double your chances. While you're there you could perhaps follow her and take a peek at her etsy shop. When you see the collection of her work and her artistic range, I think you too will be seduced.
"KISS THE GIRL" (THE LITTLE MERMAID)
Seems she forgot all about the library
This vision defect occurs in 2–3% of American children. If not corrected before age eight, amblyopia will cause significant loss of stereoscopic vision, the ability to perceive three-dimensional depth.
My motto is, leave me alone
When I attended university I learned that the brain is hardwired once we reach young adulthood. The analogy used is that when we are young, the brain is a bit like dough, which can be kneaded into various forms, but when we reach young adulthood we put the dough in the oven and it comes out with a bread crust on it. The brain is then ‘hardwired,’ we were taught.
King Banaian has been a professor at SCSU for 26 years. He has Been Chairmen for the Econ. Dept. for nine years.
Spoon filling onto one half and gently fold dough over and crimp edges.
76. Gone Baby Gone (Casey Affleck) – Do you make the call or not?
And I will rise when He calls my name
The standard procedure was to keep the firearm in safe police custody until all legal matters pertaining to ownership and court cases had been finalized. The new Firearm’s Control Act made it near impossible for owners of lost or stolen firearms to get their firearms back once it landed in police custody. Most firearms were eventually destroyed anyway, - after a certain amount of time had elapsed.
Rogue Mocha Porter
Running time (of viewed version): 1:28- 8:26: 6:58
And the young men who move in your circles
Fri 11/7 New York , NY Roseland Ballroom
so maybe this wasn’t such a bad place to start either.
NOTE: Given the opinion in Bilski and the test requiring "transformation or reduction of an article to a different state or thing," would a Method For Swinging On A Swing be patentable subject matter? You decide.
We worked in the garden until about 11:30 this morning. It feels like July instead of April 22. The kids are swimming in the pool that is how warm it is right now. We will have snow in the mountains by Wednesday.
Every character – but especially the core group – is very, very real. I feel like I probably overuse that remark in my reviews, hand it out too frequently, because then it loses some of its force and I get to a book like this and all I can do is add more emphasis. Because seriously, they are. There are girls like Taylor and Raffy of the endless faith and light and thirteen-year-old Jessa of the endless enthusiasm and hope in high-schools across Australia, there are boys like Santangelo and Ben. As for Jonah Griggs, I wish there were boys like him who went to my high-school, but that would have been a little odd, because my high-school was all-girls. Jonah probably deserves his own entire post – he sees Taylor, accepts her, understands her. He’s not perfect, but he’s a wonderful example of what masculinity ought to look like.
And I love the texture, because while prints don’t usually suck me in, texture does.
8:30 PM: Ugh. Receipts are also definitely a single use disposable.
How will you protect yourself from disappearing if the retro – wave die down any day?
Food at the concession stand will include: Popcorn, pop, chocolate bars…. more details to be posted soon.
But a trace of sadness I sense,
But on a serious note, Mr. Greene identifies himself with his job and cannot see or imagine himself in retirement or in another position. Mr. Greene is not a man of faith and so we would have to look a bit further and ask what could have happened to Mr. Greene at age 12 that he is still playing out and having great difficulty in controlling his emotional and physical self. I would shudder to think that he is doing to other people what was done to him perhaps when he was 12 years old.
Another mandatory part of all of my dream kitchens is the Lombard light from Rejuvenation. I would get two of them so there would be plenty of light and put them both on dimmers. I like laboratory lighting when I'm cooking, but would love to be able to have mood lighting during a party when folks are in and out of the kitchen. Because no matter how much you put things out in the living room or how teeny tiny your kithen is, people always gather there. And with tile like this? The party will ALWAYS be on in the kitchen. And I like it.
She reflected often on her assumed identity, and where Norma Jeane fit in. “I never wanted to be Marilyn—it just happened. Marilyn’s like a veil I wear over Norma Jeane,” she admitted to Schiller. During a photography session, she told him, “I always have a full-length mirror next to the camera when I’m doing publicity stills. That way, I know how I look.” Schiller asked, “So, do you pose for the photographer or for the mirror?” “The mirror,” she replied without hesitating. “I can always find Marilyn in the mirror.”
3. Later that same day in Yellowstone as we had circled south and were driving through the Tower area in the center of the park, we found another parking lot of cars on the side of the road. There, 50 yards off the road was a young black bear plain as day. It was foraging at the edge of the woods. I know everyone says stay in your car when you come up to wildlife, but this was too much. My youngest son and I were out quickly cameras in hand, but so were 100 other people. We watched the bear for 5 minutes, taking a million pictures, then it turned right towards the cars and bounded towards the crowd. Of course, people scattered, then the bear galloped between the cars crossing the road and ran off across a field. It was as if we were nothing more than nuisance to that bear.
“When Quidditch started 7 years ago at Middlebury College, it was basically just a bunch of kids running around on broomsticks throwing a volleyball through hoops and dodging dodge balls,” said junior Aerin Klump, a member of Michigan State’s Spartan Spitfires. “It has really evolved from there into something I would consider an actual sport, considering the amount of physical activity that occurs during the game.”
AND another thing: As a result of the flat I got on my ride to Oura on Sunday, I have had to replace the Vulcan’s rear tyre (a large chunk of rubber was missing from the Continental Gatorskin, leaving what looked like canvas exposed to the road.)
People stare at you when you're out walking, and assume that you must be a narc, because you're white.
A musty smell assaulted her as she entered the back room and flipped on the overhead fluorescents. She scanned the boxes of doll parts and skeins of yarn until she found what she was looking for. She approached the box, lifted the lid, and parted the tissue.
So exactly the same as before cut out a spiral but then cut a wavy edge along the outer edges of the spiral. You could of course just cut the spiral with a wavy edge to start off but that makes the base wavy too and it is then harder to stick down.
Today was another great day here in Texas! What better way to celebrate than go to one of our favorite places, Mercer Arboretum. I've posted on here about Mercer quite a bit...I love it. Especially this time of year! I wish this weather would last forever, but I know we are about to lock ourselves inside, crank up the a/c, and drink lots of beer (and lemonade for the kids). I know we won't do that, we'll be pool and beachside, but you get my drift.
Next time, I might actually try adding in some herbs to the jars with the oil in them to add to the taste and flavor BUT for now this is good.
When I think about it, I guess it makes sense that I would be more inclined to want a creative job. My mother & grandmother are both very creative. When I was a child my mom would sew all the time and I still remember the year she recreated the entire pocahontas costume from the disney movie, (it was one of my favorite films at the time) for me to wear for Halloween. It was way better than any cheap costume I could have bought at the store and she even found me some real moccasins from the thrift store. I was in heaven.
"Ah and where do they come from?"
Where it really shines is the bathroom... rub sinks, tub or toilets with a sprinkle of cream of tartar and grout whitens and stains disappear!
Mind you, I've actually resolved this year to see a bit more of Europe before I move back to the US, if I end up doing that. Oh, and maybe perfect my latex craft a bit more and make moves to a more consistent line and build my Essential Latex brand.
Exceptional circumstances require exceptional measures. The rights of victims and decent citizens who are living in fear must surely rank above than the rights of suspected violent thugs. Decent citizens shouldn’t be going to bed in fear tonight, but they will.
Pete had a bit of a stutter, but no one teased him about it because he was one of the funniest guys I ever met, and any of us would have creamed anyone who did.
Saturday-Sunday, generally: UNPACK (but not anywhere that will be remodeled, argh); keep kids out of pool; restrain jealousy that my parents, aunts and uncles, and grandparents are all in Hawaii.
Because we are, after all, a theatrical production, attendance by the entire cast at rehearsals is vital. Your ordinary, volunteer-based community theatre production, which plays maybe five performances usually rehearses for two or three months prior, often two or three times a week. Failure to attend is virtually unthinkable, as everyone needs to know their lines, blocking, cues, reactions, and be comfortable working with their fellow cast members.
thirty-one, her husband moved out. She
The vases were made out of used, tin cans that I wrapped with some dollar store white ribbon and hot glued on loose beads that look like pearls. These were also filled with Baby's Breath. I think it turned out pretty cute for the budget.
We have done family photo's last summer when Eli was 10 1/2 months with Adam's family but I never got some with my mom done professionally. This year I thought this would be a great present to my mother and I am so happy it all came together! Eli had a meltdown in the beginning because he refused to nap like usual....As a result we never got the portrait I really set out to get in my mind but we were able to work around his cranky behavior with the help of the red radio flyer wagon. Once we got the wagon out he turned the corner, thankfully! It's funny how sometimes you have your mind set on something and what you get in return is even better. At least that's my opinion of the pictures I have seen so far that Chrissy sent over to us. I am so excited to see the whole CD when she has it done!
May she guide me to the healthy food, the water, and the things that nourish this temple of mine.
But my new baskets are no joke. I love new sneakers when they’re all springy and make you feel like you can literally go that extra mile. This morning, I went to another goofy aerobics/body conditioning class at the gym. Just me and a couple French dudes, doing Jazzercise-type dance moves and pumping iron to club music. Awesome.
"Manna"
YIISA did inspire an entire generation of young scholars to deal with antisemitism in a new, much more critical way we used to do in North America and Europe. Israel has of course the longest record of high-profile research on antisemitism.
Renowned prophet and servant of God Temitope Balogun Joshua popularly known as Prophet TB Joshua who is the founder and leader of Synagogue of All Nations church has prophesied that English Giants Chelsea will lift this years Uefa Champions league trophy.
Yall have a good night!!!
I have a sarcastic sense of humor. I usually try to reign it in. However, today , I will disclose my personal solutions for the oil spill.
The music was perfectly suited to the dancing. I like that DWTS has decided to adopt the ‘Theme’ format that all other competition shows seem to have perfected. Motown was a far better theme than KISS headlining Rock Week. I just have to think that sitting around the production table wouldve been a struggle… because Gladys Knight (arguably the move well known and well… preserved of all the MOtowners) was unavailable.
Father God, Holy, Good and Merciful,
6 become
Of course, saying yes to review a proposal on a topic that you find somewhat-to-very interesting doesn't mean the proposal will be good (or very good). And, unless you have reviewed proposals and/or manuscripts by the PI/coPIs before, you may not know in advance whether it is likely to be well written or not.
A lot of people don't perform too well under the stress of great expectation and to tell the truth, most guys are bloody hopeless without a road map or an operation manual.
As I am sitting on my bed attempting to work, I hear playing in the hallway and the sweetest little voice repeating 'happy.. happy.. happy daaaay!' Today however is no different than any other day. Christmas is over, the tree is back in the attic, its just another normal day..I love that the simple things bring her joy.
The good Doctor played to this and – rather bravely, I felt – decided to incorporate the gent in his act which eventually culminated in his – even more bravely – inviting the guy up onto the stage.
Now the author has completely updated, revised and greatly expanded the book to include more recent first hand accounts of the horrific atrocities and the inspiring stories of Christian faith under fire in Sudan. The book is now three times its original size with 320 pages, including over 200 pictures and maps.
What we have here is a soap opera lasting about an hour and a half, but set to the same tune repeated 22 times. You’d think that’d be tedious but you’d be wrong. Because from minute one onward, it’s the craziest thing you’ve ever seen/heard in your life. It’s sort of like Napoleon Dynamite (2004), but gangster and set entirely to music.
Despite the loose tale of ill-repute that Cindy told in yesterday’s blog post, she did get one thing right: I do love me my mango juice. However, note that only one of these is mine, and that 2 of them are Clark’s.
Other big news that occurred over the same time period: a close family member (not in my household, but close) was diagnosed with a terrible, horrible, no-good, incurable, degenerative disease. The kind of disease where I had to give serious thought to how I might have to stop working and become a caregiver. I found that I just couldn't allow myself to think about it too much, as I was already tied up in knots re. the job situation and my head might have exploded if I really thought about the future too much. (And the future is grim, dear readers. Where I may be in 5 or so years may have to be the subject of a completely different blog.)
It's said that the happiest in Gable's life was during his marriage to Carole Lombard, together they were a force to be reckoned with.. he provided her with the stability she needed ad he thrived from being around her frank, youthful and energetic persona. After 3 years of happily married life, Lombard was killed in an aeroplane accident, leaving Gable in a state of shock and isolation, he retreated to their shared home to mourn. Although at home he had broken down, he managed to maintain professionalism on set and kept his unruly drinking habits and breakdowns for away from the spotlight. After the war Gable started a production company with Jane Russell and her husband and slowly became frustrated by the lack of decent roles presented to him by MGM... several years later he sadly passed away from a heart attack.
I do expect a tough game on Thursday night but i do believe we might just sneak it.
Keeps me whole.
Meanwhile, checking in. xox
And our desires. Although she strews the leaves
(Oct 14) Deadly rain and thick hail that lashed southeast Queensland in Australia and left thousands of homes without power and hundreds of homes and businesses severely damaged. Read more HERE.
to state or represent less strongly or strikingly than the facts would bear out; set forth in restrained, moderate, or weak terms: The casualty lists understate the extent of the disaster.
Desc :
The second thing I can confirm is the menu for Pete Brown's Beer & Food pairing event. 2 beers per course, the first an ale from the festival, the other a world beer. As I don't know how to embed a document here, I've just copied and pasted so excuse any nasty bits of layout:
I don’t watch the show regularly but I catch an episode every once in while. And I think that the show’s editors often miss an opportunity to show deeper aspects of health. With its focus on last-chance workouts and weigh-ins, the show focuses on physical transformations only. But as these contestants lose weight, there seems to be something happening off camera where they are facing demons and dealing with issues that are affecting their personal happiness and causing them to engage in unhealthy activity, such as overeating. As a result, they are not just thinner at the end of the show. They are happy. They hint at their personal struggles in some off-camera interviews during the show, but we never really know what is affecting them on the inside that is causing them to reach these unhealthy states.
Come to think of it for years I hankered after a Victorian pile full of features and for years I had to make do with modern double glazed boxes, flats with no souls. Well now I have one; fireplaces, tiles, picture rails, hollyhocks, and I could not feel emptier and more alone.
50 to 55K plus 10% bonus
Tiny, tiny pots of sparkly nail varnish
Make a grab for the book of prayers.
My poor, adorable, darling, sweetheart of a Mr. Jones came down with a nasty stomach virus at about 5am.
In 2006 he voluntarily deployed to Iraq. There he became aware of corruption within the Quantico support establishment that cost many under-equipped Marines their lives. His subsequent disclosures to the OSD, Congress and the press contributed to dramatic life-saving improvements in rapid acquisition.
If a sibling hits on something that is particularly hurtful with the other sibling, it becomes fodder for future arguments.
